Idaho, session 2025, H0206.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:


SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. (1) The Legislature finds
that:
(a) Relocating emergency medical services (EMS) from the Department of
Health and Welfare to the Idaho Military Division will draw greater at-
tention to the importance of emergency medical services in Idaho; and
(b) Locating the state administration of emergency medical services at
the same state agency that already coordinates emergency management at
the state and local level will lead to improved services and provide op-
portunity for continued improvement and cross collaboration for these
comparable systems.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a) The director of the Department of Health and Welfare and the adju-
tant general at the Idaho Military Division coordinate the transfer of
emergency medical service functions from the Department of Health and
Welfare to the Idaho Military Division as described in this act and that
the transfer be complete effective July 1, 2025;
(b) All existing, but no new, rights, powers, duties, budgets, funds,
contracts, rules, regulations, and policies, administrative and rule-
making proceedings, contested cases, civil actions, and other matters
relating to emergency medical services described in this act, currently
vested with the director of the Department of Health and Welfare and the
Board of Health and Welfare, be transferred to the Idaho Military Divi-
sion as described in this act no later than July 1, 2025;
(c) Emergency medical services rulemaking authority sunset on July 1,
2027, and that before the adjournment sine die of the first regular ses-
sion of the 69th Idaho Legislature, the Idaho Military Division's emer-
gency medical services program propose for codification in the chapter
created in this act any necessary provision found in EMS administrative
rules; and
(d) The adjutant general explore any organizational efficiencies from
combining hazardous material programs at the military division with
EMS.
SECTION 2. That Title 46, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 9, Title 46, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 9
EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES ACT
46-901. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Emergency Medical Services Act."
46-904. EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES -- MEDICAL DIRECTOR. (1) Consis-
tent with provisions of this chapter, there is hereby established within the
division an emergency medical services program. The adjutant general, as
administrator of the division, shall supervise and administer the emergency
medical services program and shall hire or cause to be hired the necessary
personnel responsible for administering it. The responsibilities of the
emergency medical services program shall include but are not limited to
assisting qualified entities in providing first aid emergency medical ser-


vices and providing transportation of the sick and injured. The division is
authorized to establish regulations regarding the administration of emer-
gency medical services, licensing, and certification in Idaho and to issue
emergency medical services certifications, licenses, and permits.
(2) The division shall adopt standards concerning the administration
of this chapter, including criteria for educational programs, certification
and licensure of personnel, certification of EMS instructors, licensure of
ambulance, air medical and nontransport services, manufacturing standards
for ambulances and nontransport vehicles, criteria for the use of air medi-
cal services by licensed EMS personnel at emergency scenes, establishment of
fees for training, inspections, and licensure, appropriate requirements for
renewal of licensure of personnel and agencies, and the management of com-
plaints, investigations, and license actions against licensed EMS person-
nel and agencies. Additionally, in consultation with the medical director,
the division shall develop guidelines, standards, and procedures for reduc-
ing exposure to pathogens from human blood, tissue, or fluids. Such guide-
lines, standards, and procedures shall be made available to all law enforce-
ment personnel, all emergency medical services personnel and agencies, and
such other emergency personnel who request such information.
(3) By employment or contract, the division shall retain the services
of a physician licensed in the state of Idaho with experience in emergency
medicine to serve as medical director. The medical director shall not be
the person hired by the adjutant general to administer the emergency medical
services program. The medical director shall:
(a) Advise program leadership on standards for scope of practice and
the required level of medical supervision by a physician for personnel
and agencies licensed under this chapter;
(b) Advise program leadership on disciplinary actions against licensed
personnel and agencies; and
(c) Carry out any other function assigned to him in law or at the request
of program leadership.
46-905. USE AND DISTRIBUTION OF EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES FUNDS --
COUNTY ACCOUNTABILITY. (1) The division shall be responsible for distribut-
ing moneys, subject to legislative appropriation, from the emergency med-
ical services vehicle and equipment grant fund created in section 57-830,
Idaho Code, to qualifying nonprofit and governmental entities that submit an
application for a grant from the fund. Grants from the fund may cover the
cost of vehicles and equipment, training, licensing expenses, communica-
tion technology, dispatch services, and costs associated with assuring the
performance of planned coverage and emergency response, including highway
safety and emergency response to motor vehicle accidents.
(a) The division shall approve grants from the fund based on the follow-
ing criteria:
(i) The applicant is a nonprofit or governmental entity that
holds a current license as an ambulance or nontransport service
issued by the division;
(ii) The applicant has demonstrated need based on criteria estab-
lished by the division;


(iii) The applicant has provided verification that it has received
the approval and endorsement of a fire district, city, or county
within its service area;
(iv) The applicant has certified that the title to any vehicle
purchased with funds from the fund shall be in the name of the fire
district, city, or county that endorsed the application and shall
submit proof of titling to the division as soon as practicable; and
(v) The state of Idaho shall retain a security interest in the ve-
hicle to secure the performance of the grant recipient to utilize
the vehicle consistent with the intent described in the applica-
tion.
(b) Notwithstanding the requirements of paragraph (a)(iii) and (iv) of
this subsection, the division is authorized to approve and issue a grant
to an applicant in the absence of an endorsement if the endorsement is
withheld without adequate justification.
(2) The division shall be responsible for distributing moneys, subject
to legislative appropriation, from the emergency medical services fund cre-
ated in section 57-829, Idaho Code. Moneys in the fund shall be used exclu-
sively for costs associated with emergency medical services. However, if
the legislature appropriates moneys to the fund for sustainability grants
to cover personnel and operating costs associated with assuring the sustain-
ability and availability of emergency medical services, applicants may only
be approved by the division subject to the following criteria:
(a) The applicant is a nonprofit or governmental entity that holds a
current emergency medical services agency license issued by the divi-
sion that authorizes the agency as a 911 response agency;
(b) The application clearly defines the applicant's service area spe-
cific to 911 response;
(c) The applicant must certify, if it is eligible to bill for services,
that it has billed health insurance carriers for at least eighty percent
(80%) of eligible billable services it provided in the previous year.
If the applicant is newly licensed and does not have twelve (12) months
of historical billing information, the applicant must certify that it
is currently billing and will continue to bill health insurance carri-
ers for at least eighty percent (80%) of eligible services; and
(d) If the applicant fulfills the requirements of paragraphs (a), (b),
and (c) of this subsection, the county in which the applicant provides
911 response services may, in its discretion, endorse the grant appli-
cation of the requesting entity. A county endorsing an application must
have submitted a plan that has been approved by the division that spec-
ifies how emergency medical services 911 responses shall be covered and
coordinated throughout the entire county.
(3) The provision of emergency medical services is a government func-
tion. If the division approves applications for sustainability grants
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, counties are authorized and re-
quired to ensure that emergency medical services are reasonably available
throughout the county.
(4) It is the intent of the legislature that counties that accept sus-
tainability grants pursuant to subsection (2) of this section use a portion


of the sustainability grant to implement or maintain community health EMS in
the service area.
46-911. PERSONNEL AND AGENCIES LICENSURE ACTIONS -- GROUNDS -- PROCE-
DURE. (1) Subject to the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, the
division, upon recommendation of the EMS medical director, may deny a li-
cense or refuse to renew a license for a person, or may suspend or revoke a
license or may impose probationary conditions, if the holder of a license or
the applicant for a license has engaged in unprofessional conduct that has
endangered or is likely to endanger the health, welfare, or safety of the
public. Such unprofessional conduct includes but is not limited to:
(a) Obtaining a license by means of fraud, misrepresentation, or con-
cealment of a material fact;
(b) Being found guilty of unprofessional conduct as defined by the di-
vision;
(c) Being convicted of a crime that would have a direct and adverse
bearing on the licensee's ability to practice or perform emergency med-
ical care competently;
(d) The unauthorized practice of medicine;
(e) Violating any provisions of this chapter or any regulations adopted
under this chapter; and
(f) Being found mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdic-
tion.
(2) Subject to the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, the
division may deny, revoke, or refuse to renew a license of an agency, or may
impose probationary conditions or fines as a condition of an agency's abil-
ity to retain a license in accordance with regulations adopted by the divi-
sion.
(3) A denial, refusal to renew, suspension, revocation, or imposition
of probationary conditions on a license may be ordered by the division after
opportunity for a hearing as provided in section 46-910(4), Idaho Code.
(4) An application for reinstatement may be filed with the division one
(1) year from the date of license revocation. In the event a timely appli-
cation is filed, the division, upon recommendation of the EMS medical direc-
tor, may accept or reject the application for reinstatement. An opportunity
for a hearing as provided in section 46-910(4), Idaho Code, shall follow any
rejection under this subsection, and the opportunity for appeal as set forth
in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, shall follow if the division affirms its
initial decision.
46-913. PENALTIES FOR VIOLATIONS. (1) Any person who practices or at-
tempts to practice EMS as a licensed provider of emergency care as provided
for in this chapter, without having at the time of violation a valid, unex-
pired, unrestricted, unrevoked, and unsuspended license issued by the divi-
sion under this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject
to a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment for not
more than six (6) months, or both, for each violation.
(2) Any person establishing, conducting, managing, or operating any
agency as provided for in this chapter without a license issued by the divi-
sion under this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject


to a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment for
not more than six (6) months, or both. Each day of continuing violation shall
constitute a separate offense.
46-916. IDAHO TIME SENSITIVE EMERGENCY SYSTEM -- COUNCIL -- COMPOSI-
TION -- DUTIES. (1) There is hereby created within the division the Idaho
time sensitive emergency system council. Council members shall be appointed
by and serve at the pleasure of the governor. Terms on the council shall be
for four (4) years, and vacancies on the council for unexpired terms shall be
filled by appointment by the governor for the remainder of the term. Coun-
cil members shall be selected to assure geographic, rural, and clinical spe-
cialty representation.
(2) The membership of the council shall include the following:
(a) One (1) representative from a facility that either holds or is seek-
ing designation as an Idaho trauma center. The representative shall be
the medical director, the coordinator, or the program manager responsi-
ble for the respective facility's trauma program;
(b) One (1) representative from a facility that either holds or is seek-
ing designation as an Idaho stroke facility. The representative shall
be the medical director, the coordinator, or the program manager re-
sponsible for the respective facility's stroke program;
(c) One (1) representative from a facility that either holds or is seek-
ing designation as an Idaho heart attack center. The representative
shall be the medical director, the coordinator, or the program manager
responsible for the respective facility's heart attack program;
(d) One (1) representative from an EMS agency licensed by the division
that serves a primarily urban response area;
(e) One (1) representative from an EMS agency licensed by the division
that serves a primarily rural response area;
(f) One (1) representative from an air medical EMS agency licensed by
the division;
(g) One (1) administrator of an Idaho hospital that either holds or is
seeking Idaho trauma, stroke, or heart attack designation;
(h) One (1) chief executive officer or administrator of an Idaho crit-
ical access hospital that either holds or is seeking Idaho trauma,
stroke, or heart attack designation;
(i) One (1) licensed health care provider who routinely works in the
emergency department of a hospital that serves a primarily urban area
that either holds or is seeking Idaho trauma, stroke, or heart attack
designation;
(j) One (1) licensed health care provider who routinely works in the
emergency department of a hospital that serves a primarily rural area
that either holds or is seeking Idaho trauma, stroke, or heart attack
designation; and
(k) One (1) member of the public.
(3) The chair of each regional time sensitive committee established
pursuant to section 46-918, Idaho Code, shall be added as a voting member of
the council when the regional time sensitive emergency committee is imple-
mented and the chair is selected.


(4) The governor shall appoint a chair who shall serve a term of two (2)
years. The council may elect other officers as it may deem necessary and ap-
propriate. The council shall meet at least semiannually and at the call of
the chair.
(5) The duties of the council shall be as follows:
(a) Develop, implement, and monitor a voluntary statewide system that
includes trauma, stroke, and heart attack facilities;
(b) Provide oversight of the system, assuring adherence to standards
and regulations established by the council;
(c) Establish substate system regions that provide more effective
access to the system. In the designation of these regions, specific
consideration shall be given to geography and patient referral patterns
for the facilities and agencies included therein;
(d) Establish a regional time sensitive emergency committee in each
substate region;
(e) Develop the standards and criteria that each participating facil-
ity that voluntarily applies is required to meet concerning personnel,
equipment, resources, data collection, and organizational capabili-
ties to obtain or maintain designation;
(f) Develop procedures for and the duration of the designation of
a trauma, stroke, or heart attack facility, including application
procedures, verification procedures, investigation of complaints
pertaining to designation, and emergency suspension or revocation of
designation;
(g) Develop operational procedures for the regional time sensitive
emergency committees;
(h) Facilitate the implementation of nationally accepted standards
throughout the voluntary system;
(i) Set procedures for the acquisition of data needed to successfully
manage the system; and
(j) Collaborate and cooperate with the division, the EMS medical direc-
tor, local governments, and local EMS agencies and associations to ad-
dress recruitment and retention concerns of local EMS providers.
46-917. IDAHO TIME SENSITIVE EMERGENCY SYSTEM -- DESIGNATION AS IDAHO
TRAUMA, STROKE, AND HEART ATTACK CENTERS. (1) The council shall designate a
hospital as a trauma, stroke, or heart attack center when such hospital, upon
proper application and verification, has been found by the council to meet
the applicable level of trauma, stroke, or heart attack center criteria as
established by the council.
(2) In developing trauma, stroke, and heart attack center designation
criteria, the council shall use, as is practicable, appropriate peer-re-
viewed or evidence-based research, including but not limited to the most
recent guidelines of the American college of surgeons committee on trauma,
the American college of cardiology, and the American heart association for
heart attack centers, the joint commission's primary stroke center certi-
fication program criteria for stroke centers, or primary and comprehensive
stroke center recommendations as published by the American stroke associa-
tion or other nationally recognized authoritative standards.


(3) Designation criteria adopted by the council shall be publicly
available.
(4) The council shall conduct a periodic verification review of every
trauma, stroke, and heart attack facility. Verification reviews shall be
coordinated for the different types of centers to the extent practicable
with hospital resources. No person who has a substantial conflict of inter-
est in the operation of any trauma, stroke, and heart attack center under
review shall participate in the verification review of the facility.
(5) The council shall coordinate an on-site review as necessary to as-
sure that a hospital meets the criteria for the desired designation. The
council may waive an on-site review when a hospital has been verified by a
nationally recognized accrediting body to meet or exceed standards estab-
lished by the council.
(6) The council may deny, place on probation, suspend, or revoke any
designation when it has reasonable cause to believe that there has been mis-
representation or falsification of information or a substantial failure to
comply with the criteria for designation promulgated by the council. If the
council has reasonable cause to believe that a hospital is not in compliance
with such provisions, it may require the facility to submit additional docu-
mentation or undergo additional site reviews to verify compliance.
(7) No hospital may hold itself out to the public as an Idaho-designated
trauma center, Idaho-designated stroke facility, or Idaho-designated heart
attack facility unless it is designated as such by the council.
(8) A hospital aggrieved because of a council decision pursuant to this
section shall be entitled to appeal as provided in section 46-910(4), Idaho
Code. The opportunity for appeal as set forth in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho
Code, shall follow if the council affirms its initial decision.
46-919. IDAHO TIME SENSITIVE EMERGENCY SYSTEM -- CREATION OF TSE REG-
ISTRY -- PURPOSE. (1) The division, or an authorized contractor of the divi-
sion, shall:
(a) Establish a TSE registry to collect and analyze information on the
incidence, severity, causes, and outcomes of TSEs, and other such data
necessary to evaluate trauma, strokes, and heart attacks and the health
system's response;
(b) Establish the data elements and data dictionary, including child-
specific data elements that hospitals must report, and the time frame
and format for reporting; and
(c) Support, where necessary, data collection and abstraction by pro-
viding:
(i) A data collection system and technical assistance to each
hospital; and
(ii) Funding or, at the discretion of the division, personnel for
collection and abstraction for each hospital.
(2) The specific issues to be identified and evaluated through the TSE
registry are:
(a) Trauma, stroke, and heart attack TSE surveillance;
(b) Geographic patterns of trauma incidence;
(c) Types of TSEs treated in hospitals in Idaho;


(d) Areas or regions of the state where improvements in the emergency
medical system may be needed;
(e) Public education and prevention needs and efforts; and
(f) Other factors to consider in recommending, designing, or imple-
menting a statewide TSE system.
(3) The data collected by the TSE registry shall be of such a nature as
to allow the division to identify at least the following:
(a) Lack of access to care and improvement of the availability and de-
livery of prehospital, hospital, and post-acute TSE care;
(b) Performance of the out-of-hospital and hospital emergency medical
systems;
(c) Costs of TSE care; and
(d) Outcomes of persons who are victims of TSEs.
(4) The division shall evaluate the data collected, as well as data
collected from other relevant sources, and shall prepare an annual report.
The data shall be used to regularly produce and disseminate aggregated and
de-identified analytical reports and for recommending benchmark quality
measures and outcomes and needed educational resources to the council.
46-921. IDAHO TIME SENSITIVE EMERGENCY SYSTEM -- TSE REGISTRY CONFI-
DENTIALITY. (1) Records and information contained in the TSE registry shall
be kept confidential and may be released only as provided by this chapter and
regulations adopted by the division.
(2) The division and an authorized contractor may enter into agreements
to exchange confidential information with other TSE registries in order to
obtain complete reports of Idaho residents treated in other states and to
provide information to other states regarding such other state's residents
treated in Idaho. Agreements sharing information from the TSE registry
shall include a provision requiring the receiving agency to keep such infor-
mation confidential.
(3) The division and an authorized contractor may, in their discretion,
publish or furnish to health researchers and the public de-identified infor-
mation, including compilations and analyses thereof.
(4) The division and an authorized contractor may furnish confiden-
tial information to other TSE registries, federal TSE programs, or health
researchers in order to perform and collaborate with research studies. Per-
sons and entities receiving confidential information for research purposes
must comply with regulations of the division relating to the confidentiality
of TSE registry records and information.
(5) The division and an authorized contractor may furnish confidential
information relating to a specific hospital, including compilations and
analyses of such confidential information, to the specific hospital to which
it relates.
(6) TSE registry records and information shall not be available for
purposes of litigation except by order of the court. Any such order shall
contain such protective provisions as are reasonable and necessary to pre-
vent the public or further disclosure of the records and information and
shall contain a provision requiring the destruction of the records and in-
formation when no longer needed for the litigation.


SECTION 3. That Section 56-1011, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-1011 46-902. EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES -- STATEMENT OF IN-
TENT LEGISLATIVE PURPOSE -- CONSTRUCTION OF CHAPTER. (1) The purpose of this
chapter is It is the purpose of the legislature of the state of Idaho in the
adoption of sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, to recognize the
importance of that the delivery of emergency medical services is critical to
the life, health, and safety of Idahoans and to provide reasonable regula-
tion of the same such services. Any regulations under this chapter shall be
narrowly tailored, and all licensing requirements shall not be more restric-
tive than neighboring states or comparably situated states.
(2) For To carry out this purpose, the provisions of section 54-1804,
Idaho Code, shall not be so construed as to prohibit or penalize emergency
medical services rendered by a person authorized to render emergency medi-
cal services by sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, this chapter
if such emergency medical service is rendered under the responsible supervi-
sion and control of a licensed physician licensed in Idaho.
SECTION 4. That Section 56-1012, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-1012 46-903. DEFINITIONS. As used in sections 56-1011 through
56-1023, Idaho Code this chapter:
(1) "Advanced emergency medical technician" means a person who has met
the qualifications for licensure as set forth in sections 56-1011 through
56-1023, Idaho Code this chapter, is licensed by the EMS bureau under
sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code this chapter, carries out the
practice of emergency care within the scope of practice determined by the
commission division, and practices under the supervision of an Idaho li-
censed physician.
(2) "Agency" means any organization licensed by the EMS bureau under
this chapter that operates an air medical service, ambulance service or non-
transport service.
(3) "Air ambulance" means any privately or publicly owned fixed wing
aircraft or rotary wing aircraft used for, or intended to be used for, the
transportation of persons experiencing physiological or psychological
illness or injury who may need medical attention during transport. This
may include dual or multipurpose vehicles which that otherwise comply with
sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, and specifications estab-
lished by board rule this chapter and applicable regulations.
(4) "Air medical service" means an agency licensed by the EMS bureau
under this chapter that responds to requests for patient care and trans-
portation from hospitals and EMS agencies using a fixed wing aircraft or
rotary wing aircraft.
(5) "Ambulance" means any privately or publicly owned motor vehicle
or nautical vessel used for, or intended to be used for, the transportation
of sick or injured persons who may need medical attention during transport.
This may include dual or multipurpose vehicles which otherwise comply with
sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, and specifications estab-
lished by board rule.


(6) (5) "Ambulance service" means an agency licensed by the EMS bureau
under this chapter operated with the intent to provide personnel and equip-
ment for medical treatment at an emergency scene, during transportation or
during transfer of persons experiencing physiological or psychological ill-
ness or injury who may need medical attention during transport.
(7) (6) "Applicant" means any organization that is requesting an agency
license under this chapter and includes the following:
(a) An organization seeking a new license;
(b) An existing agency that intends to change the level of licensed per-
sonnel it utilizes;
(c) An existing agency that intends to change its geographic coverage
area, except by agency annexation;
(d) An existing nontransport service that intends to provide ambulance
service;
(e) An existing ambulance service that intends to discontinue trans-
port and become a nontransport service.
(8) "Board" means the Idaho board of health and welfare.
(9) "Commission" means the Idaho emergency medical services physician
commission.
(10) (7) "Community emergency medical technician" or "community EMT"
means an emergency medical technician or advanced emergency medical tech-
nician with additional standardized training who works within a designated
community health emergency medical services program under local medical
control as part of a community-based team of health and social services
providers.
(11) (8) "Community health emergency medical services" or "community
health EMS" means the evaluation, advice or treatment of an eligible recipi-
ent outside of a hospital setting, which that is specifically requested for
the purpose of preventing or improving a particular medical condition, and
which that is provided by a licensed emergency medical services agency. Com-
munity health EMS involving or related to emergency response must be pro-
vided by or in coordination with the primary 911 response agency for that
area.
(12) (9) "Community paramedic" means a paramedic with additional stan-
dardized training who works within a designated community health emergency
medical services program under local medical control as part of a community-
based team of health and social services providers.
(13) "Department" means the Idaho department of health and welfare.
(10) "Division" means the Idaho military division of the office of the
governor.
(14) (11) "Eligible recipient" means an individual eligible to receive
community health emergency medical services, as determined by rule of the
EMS bureau or under this chapter and applicable state regulations or as de-
termined by regulations of a local community health emergency medical ser-
vices program.
(15) (12) "Emergency medical responder" means a person who has met
the qualifications for licensure as set forth in sections 56-1011 through
56-1023, Idaho Code this chapter, is licensed by the EMS bureau under
sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code this chapter, carries out the
practice of emergency care within the scope of practice determined by the


commission division, and practices under the supervision of an Idaho li-
censed physician.
(16) (13) "Emergency medical services" or "EMS" means aid rendered by an
individual or group of individuals who do the following:
(a) Respond to a perceived need for medical care in order to prevent
loss of life or aggravation of physiological or psychological illness
or injury;
(b) Are prepared to provide interventions that are within the scope of
practice as defined by the commission division;
(c) Use an alerting mechanism to initiate a response to requests for
medical care; and
(d) Offer, advertise or attempt to respond as described in paragraphs
(a) through (c) of this subsection.
(17) "EMS bureau" means the bureau of emergency medical services of the
department.
(18) (14) "Emergency medical technician" means a person who has met
the qualifications for licensure as set forth in sections 56-1011 through
56-1023, Idaho Code this chapter, is licensed by the EMS bureau under
sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code this chapter, carries out the
practice of emergency care within the scope of practice determined by the
commission division, and practices under the supervision of an Idaho li-
censed physician.
(19) (15) "Licensed personnel" means those individuals who are emer-
gency medical responders, emergency medical technicians, advanced emer-
gency medical technicians and paramedics.
(20) (16) "National emergency medical services information system
technical assistance center" means an organization that validates software
for compliance with the EMS data set defined by the United States department
of transportation national highway traffic safety administration.
(21) (17) "Nontransport service" means an agency licensed by the EMS bu-
reau under this chapter, operated with the intent to provide personnel or
equipment for medical stabilization at an emergency scene, but not intended
to be the service that will actually transport sick or injured persons.
(22) "Nontransport vehicle" means any vehicle operated by an agency
with the intent to provide personnel or equipment for medical stabilization
at an emergency scene, but not intended as the vehicle that will actually
transport sick or injured persons.
(23) (18) "Paramedic" means a person who has met the qualifications
for licensure as set forth in sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code
this chapter, is licensed by the EMS bureau under sections 56-1011 through
56-1023, Idaho Code this chapter, carries out the practice of emergency
care within the scope of practice determined by the commission division, and
practices under the supervision of an Idaho licensed physician.
(24) (19) "Supervision" means the medical direction by a licensed
physician of activities provided by licensed personnel affiliated with a
licensed ambulance, air medical or nontransport service, including, but not
limited to: establishing standing orders and protocols, reviewing perfor-
mance of licensed personnel, providing instructions for patient care via
radio or telephone, and other oversight.


(25) (20) "Transfer" means the transportation of a patient from one (1)
medical care facility to another.
SECTION 5. That Section 56-1013, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-1013 46-907. AUTHORIZED ACTIONS. Persons licensed by the EMS bu-
reau under this chapter shall be authorized to perform such acts under writ-
ten or oral authorization of a licensed physician as shall be established by
rules of the commission the division, including, but not limited to, admin-
istration of intravenous solutions and drugs, cardiac defibrillation, air-
way management, endotracheal intubation, community health emergency medi-
cal services and other patient care.
SECTION 6. That Section 56-1014, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-1014 46-908. LIABILITY. (1) No act or omission of any person who is
duly licensed under sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, by the EMS
bureau this chapter done or omitted in good faith while rendering emergency
medical services to a person or persons who are perceived to need immedi-
ate care in order to prevent loss of life or aggravation of physiological or
psychological illness or injury shall impose any liability upon those per-
sonnel, the supervising physician, the hospital, the organization providing
the service, or upon on a federal, state, county, city or other local gov-
ernmental unit, or upon on employees of such governmental unit, unless such
provider of care or such personnel be is shown to have caused injury and dam-
ages to such person or persons as a proximate result of his, her or their
such personnel's reckless or grossly negligent misconduct, which shall be
the sole grounds for civil liability of such persons in the provision of care
or assistance under sections 56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code this chap-
ter, regardless of the circumstance under which such care or assistance may
be provided. This section shall not relieve the organization or agency oper-
ating the service from the duty of securing, maintaining and operating, the
equipment and licensure designated for use in performing the emergency medi-
cal services.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall apply to li-
censed personnel of another state of the United States who enter this state
in response to an emergency to render emergency medical services to a person
who is perceived to need immediate care in order to prevent loss of life or
aggravation of physiological or psychological illness or injury.
(3) No act or omission of any person authorized under this chapter to
provide community health emergency medical services shall impose any lia-
bility upon on such person or the person's agency or supervising physician
where the act or omission occurs in the course of providing authorized ser-
vices and is done or omitted in good faith, unless the person is shown to have
caused injury as a result of reckless or grossly negligent misconduct.
SECTION 7. That Section 56-1015, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


56-1015 46-909. FAILURE TO OBTAIN CONSENT. No Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 32-1015, Idaho Code, no person licensed under sections
56-1011 through 56-1023, Idaho Code, this chapter or physician or hospital
licensed in this state shall be subject to civil liability, based solely
upon on failure to obtain consent in rendering emergency medical, surgical,
hospital or health services to any individual regardless of age where that
individual is unable to give this consent for any reason and there is no
other person reasonably available who is legally authorized to consent to
the providing of such care,; provided, however, that such person, physician,
or hospital has acted in good faith and without knowledge of facts negating
consent. The provision or refusal of consent under sections 56-1011 through
56-1023, Idaho Code, this chapter shall be governed by chapter 45, title 39,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 8. That Section 56-1016, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-1016 46-910. AGENCY MINIMUM STANDARDS. (1) Each ambulance service,
air medical service and nontransport service shall be licensed by the EMS bu-
reau under this chapter based on the level of licensed personnel it utilizes,
transport capability and self-declared geographic coverage area and shall
meet the following standards:
(1) (a) Personnel during transport or transfer -- There shall be at
least two (2) crew members on each patient transport or transfer, with
the crew member delivering patient care being, at a minimum, a licensed
emergency medical technician (EMT) or a licensed emergency medical re-
sponder (EMR) with a valid ambulance certification issued by the EMS
bureau division.
(2) (b) Dispatch -- Each licensed EMS agency shall have a twenty-four
(24) hour dispatch arrangement and shall respond to calls on a twenty-
four (24) hour basis.
(3) (c) Agency inspections and licensing -- The EMS bureau division
shall conduct inspections at least annually related to agency licens-
ing or shall contract to have the inspections carried out. Each agency
shall have a current state license in order to operate.
(4) (d) Ambulance service minimum standards waiver -- The controlling
authority providing ambulance services may petition the board division
for waiver of the ambulance standards of section 56-1016(2), Idaho
Code, subsection (2) of this section if compliance with these standards
would cause undue hardship on the community being served, or would re-
sult in abandonment of ambulance services.
(5) (e) Nontransport service minimum standards waiver -- The control-
ling authority providing nontransport services may petition the EMS bu-
reau division for waiver of the twenty-four (24) hour response require-
ment of this section if the petition demonstrates that the community,
setting, industrial site or event is not populated on a twenty-four (24)
hour basis or does not exist on a three hundred sixty-five (365) day per
year basis or if compliance with these standards would cause undue hard-
ship on the community being served, or would result in abandonment of
nontransport services.


(6) (f) Supervision -- A licensed physician shall supervise the medical
activities provided by licensed personnel affiliated with the licensed
agency, including, but not limited to: establishing standing orders
and protocols, reviewing performance of licensed personnel, approving
methods for licensed personnel to receive instructions for patient care
via radio, telephone or in person, and other oversight as provided in
the rules of the commission regulation.
(7) (2) Applicants must submit the following information with their ap-
plications and agree to meet the following requirements as a condition of li-
censure:
(a) A declaration of anticipated applicant agency costs and revenues;
a statement of projected changes in response time; and a narrative
describing projected clinical benefits to patients resulting from li-
censure using methods defined in board rules applicable regulations
concerning such matters on an application provided by the EMS bureau
division; and
(b) Collect and report data to the EMS bureau division upon receiving
a license using a data collection system that is validated as compliant
by the national emergency medical services information system techni-
cal assistance center in accordance with board rules applicable regula-
tion.
(8) (3) The EMS bureau division will provide notice of any such appli-
cation to all cities, counties and other units of local government that have
any geographic coverage area in common with the applicant in accordance with
board rules applicable regulations. Such notice will include a summary of
the applicant data supplied to the EMS bureau division. Any other EMS bureau
division use of the cost and revenue data supplied by applicants is limited
exclusively to informational purposes.
(9) Appeal of a denial of an applicant's license will be governed by
IDAPA 16.05.03, rules governing contested case proceedings and declaratory
rulings.
(4) If the division denies an application for any reason, then such
decision may be appealed to the office of administrative hearings within
forty-two (42) days of the date of the issuance of the denial at the request
of the applicant whose request for a license was denied.
(a) The office of administrative hearings shall, within twenty-eight
(28) days of receipt of the request, review the full record regarding
the application and convene a public hearing regarding the appeal. Af-
ter the public hearing, the hearing officer shall submit a written rec-
ommendation to the division and to the applicant requesting review. The
recommendation by the hearing officer either to affirm or reverse the
division's decision shall be based on the full record regarding the ap-
plication, including this chapter and the regulations and standards es-
tablished under this chapter. The recommendation shall be in writing
and accompanied by a reasoned opinion.
(b) Within twenty-eight (28) days following the issuance of the hearing
officer's written recommendation, the division shall either affirm or
reverse its initial decision.
(c) If, upon reconsideration of a decision to deny an application, the
division:


(i) Reverses its initial decision and approves the application,
then there shall be no further appeal; or
(ii) Affirms its initial decision denying the application, then
the applicant may appeal as set forth in chapter 52, title 67,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 9. That Section 56-1023, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-1023 46-912. RULES. (1) The commission is authorized and directed
to adopt appropriate rules defining the allowable scope of practice and acts
and duties which can be performed by persons licensed by the EMS bureau and
the required level of supervision by a licensed physician.
(2) The board is authorized and directed to adopt appropriate rules and
standards concerning the administration of sections 56-1011 through 56-1022
and this section, Idaho Code, including criteria for educational programs,
certification and licensure of personnel, certification of EMS instructors,
licensure of ambulance, air medical and nontransport services, manufactur-
ing standards for ambulances and nontransport vehicles, criteria for the
use of air medical services by licensed EMS personnel at emergency scenes,
establishment of fees for training, inspections and licensure, appropriate
requirements for renewal of licensure of personnel and agencies and the man-
agement of complaints, investigations and license actions against licensed
EMS personnel and agencies. The rules of the board must be consistent with
the rules adopted by the commission.
(3) Additionally, the department shall develop guidelines, standards
and procedures for reducing exposure to pathogens from human blood, tissue
or fluids. Such guidelines, standards and procedures shall be made avail-
able to all law enforcement personnel, all emergency medical services per-
sonnel and agencies, and such other emergency personnel who request such in-
formation.
Emergency medical service rules that are in effect on July 1, 2025,
shall remain in effect as if promulgated by the division and may be amended
as necessary by the division consistent with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho
Code, subject to legislative approval. Provided however, any authority to
promulgate rules under this chapter shall be null, void, and of no effect on
and after July 1, 2027.
SECTION 10. That Section 56-1024, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-1024 46-914. IDAHO TIME SENSITIVE EMERGENCY SYSTEM OF CARE --
STATEMENT OF INTENT. Time sensitive emergencies, specifically blunt trauma
injuries, strokes and heart attacks, were three (3) of the top five (5)
causes of deaths death in Idaho in 2011. Numerous studies throughout the
United States have demonstrated that organized systems of care improve
patient outcomes, thus reducing the frequency of preventable death and im-
proving the functional status of the patient. The institute of medicine's
report "Hospital-Based Emergency Care: At the Breaking Point" recommended
improving the care of critical illness through regionalization by trans-
porting critically ill patients to designated specialized care centers when


appropriate. Early treatment and transfer when necessary will save the
lives of Idahoans stricken with these emergency conditions. Trauma systems
of care are well understood as they have existed in many other states for
decades. It is the intent of this legislation the legislature, in sections
46-914 through 46-922, Idaho Code, to create an integrated and responsive
system of care for Idaho citizens. The trauma component will serve as the
initial framework in a deliberate, incremental implementation approach for
a comprehensive system of care for time sensitive emergencies in Idaho. The
time sensitive emergency system in Idaho is intended to be voluntary and
inclusive. The system will be designed such that all facilities, and in
particular critical access hospitals, have the opportunity to participate.
No facility shall be excluded from receiving medically appropriate patients
based solely on the facility's decision of not seeking designation.
SECTION 11. That Section 56-1026, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-1026 46-915. IDAHO TIME SENSITIVE EMERGENCY SYSTEM -- CREATION AND
DEFINITIONS. (1) There is hereby created a voluntary time sensitive emer-
gency system within the department of health and welfare division.
(2) As used in sections 46-914 through 46-922, Idaho Code:
(a) "Confidential information" means information that may identify a
patient, health care facility, or health care practitioner.
(b) "Contractor" means an individual, partnership, corporation, or
other entity performing TSE registry services under a contractual
agreement with the division.
(c) "Council" means the Idaho time sensitive emergency system council.
(d) "De-identified information" means records and information con-
tained in the TSE registry, including compilations and analyses
thereof, that do not contain information that might identify a patient,
health care facility, or health care practitioner.
(e) "Heart attack" means a STEMI, which is a common name for an ST-el-
evation myocardial infarction, a more precise description of a type of
heart attack that is caused by a prolonged period of blocked blood sup-
ply that affects a large area of the heart and has a substantial risk of
death and disability calling for a quick response.
(f) "Hospital" has the same meaning as in 42 CFR.
(g) "Stroke" means an interruption of blood flow to the brain causing
paralysis, slurred speech, or altered brain function usually caused by
a blockage in a blood vessel that carries blood to the brain (ischemic
stroke) or by a blood vessel bursting (hemorrhagic).
(h) "Trauma" means the result of an act or event that damages, harms, or
hurts a human being resulting in intentional or unintentional damage to
the body resulting from acute exposure to mechanical, thermal, electri-
cal, or chemical energy or from the absence of such essentials as heat or
oxygen.
(i) "TSE" means a time sensitive emergency, specifically trauma,
stroke, or heart attack.
(j) "TSE registry" means the population-based data system that pro-
vides ongoing and systematic collection, analysis, interpretation,
and dissemination of information related to trauma, stroke, and heart


attack for system improvement, prevention, and research activities.
Elements in the registry shall describe the nature and scope of the
injury, illness, or health condition and identify the incidence and
prevalence of traumatic injury, illness or health condition, severity
of injury, performance of out-of-hospital and hospital emergency med-
ical systems, patient outcomes, and the impact of trauma, stroke, and
heart attack on the health care system.
(k) "TSE system" means the organized approach to treating injured
patients that establishes and promotes standards for patient trans-
portation, equipment, and information analysis for effective and
coordinated TSE care. TSE systems represent a continuum of care that
is fully integrated into the emergency medical services system and is a
coordinated effort between out-of-hospital and hospital providers with
the close cooperation of medical specialists in each phase of care. The
focus is on prevention, coordination of acute care, and aggressive re-
habilitation. Systems are designed to be inclusive of all patients with
a TSE requiring acute care facilities, striving to meet the needs of the
patient, regardless of the severity of injury, geographic location, or
population density. A TSE system seeks to prevent injuries from happen-
ing and the reduction of death and disability when it does happen.
SECTION 12. That Section 56-1030, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-1030 46-918. REGIONAL TIME SENSITIVE EMERGENCY COMMITTEES IDAHO
TIME SENSITIVE EMERGENCY SYSTEM -- REGIONAL COMMITTEES -- MEMBERSHIP --
DUTIES. (1) Pursuant to section 56-1028(4), Idaho Code As required by this
chapter, each substate region designated by the council shall have a time
sensitive emergency committee.
(2) Membership of each regional TSE committee shall be based on the
needs of the region and can be modified as the regional TSE committee deter-
mines, but each regional committee shall be initially comprised as follows:
(a) Each facility that is designated or is seeking designation by the
council as a trauma center, stroke facility or heart attack facility may
appoint one (1) representative for each of the designations that the fa-
cility holds or is seeking to hold to the regional committee for the re-
gion in which the facility is located;
(b) Each air medical EMS agency that provides patient transport within
the region may appoint one (1) representative;
(c) Each hospital that either holds or is seeking Idaho trauma, stroke
or heart attack designation may appoint the hospital administrator;
(d) Each EMS agency with a response area in the region may appoint one
(1) representative; and
(e) The regional committee shall include a pediatrician or an expert in
children's trauma.
(3) Members of a regional committee shall elect a chair to serve a term
of two (2) years.
(4) The duties of each regional committee shall be as follows:
(a) Implement care guidelines, policies, procedures and protocols for
the regional TSE system;


(b) Conduct regional quality improvement, including receipt of reports
prepared by the council containing trauma, stroke and heart attack data
and making recommendations to facilities within the region based upon
those reports;
(c) Advise the council concerning the statewide system;
(d) Establish trauma, stroke and heart attack education and prevention
programs;
(e) Provide advice concerning trauma, stroke and heart attack care to
health care facilities and other providers of health care;
(f) Perform other duties required by Idaho code and council rules in law
and council regulations; and
(g) Conduct other activities needed to ensure optimal delivery of
trauma, stroke and heart attack care services within the region.
SECTION 13. That Section 57-2004, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
57-2004 46-920. IDAHO TIME SENSITIVE EMERGENCY SYSTEM -- PARTICI-
PATION IN PROGRAM TSE REGISTRY. (1) Each licensed hospital in the state
shall report each case of TSE which that meets the inclusion criteria to the
department division or the authorized contractor of the department division
within one hundred eighty (180) days of treatment.
(2) Each report of TSE shall include information as defined by the
department division.
(3) The department division or authorized contractor of the department
division shall have physical access to all records which that would iden-
tify reportable cases and/or establish characteristics, treatment or medi-
cal status of reportable cases in the event that there has been a failure to
report as delineated in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the department division or
authorized contractor from identifying and reporting cases using data link-
ages with death records, other registries, and other potential sources.
SECTION 14. That Section 57-2007, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
57-2007 46-922. IDAHO TIME SENSITIVE EMERGENCY SYSTEM -- TSE REGISTRY
AND LIMITATION OF LIABILITY -- EXCEPTIONS. (1) No action for damages arising
from the disclosure of confidential information may be maintained against
any reporting entities or employees of such entities that participate in
good faith in the reporting of TSE registry data in accordance with this
chapter.
(2) No license of a health care facility or health care practitioner may
be denied, suspended or revoked for the good faith disclosure of confiden-
tial information in accordance with this chapter.
(3) The immunity granted in subsections (1) and (2) of this section
shall not be construed to apply to the unauthorized disclosure of confiden-
tial information when such disclosure is due to gross negligence or willful
misconduct of the reporting entities.


SECTION 15. That Chapter 8, Title 57, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 57-829, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
57-829. EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES FUND. (1) There is hereby created
in the state treasury the emergency medical services fund to be managed by
the state treasurer. Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys transferred to the fund pursuant to section 49-452, Idaho
Code;
(b) Moneys transferred to the fund pursuant to section 49-306, Idaho
Code;
(c) Legislative appropriations to the fund;
(d) Any bequests or donations to the fund; and
(e) Interest earned on idle moneys in the fund.
(2) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as is practicable, the state
controller shall transfer any unobligated moneys in the emergency medical
services fund established in section 56-1018, Idaho Code, and the emergency
medical services fund II established in section 56-1018A, Idaho Code, to the
fund created in this section.
(3) Subject to legislative appropriation, the Idaho military division
shall use and distribute moneys from the fund as provided in section 46-905,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 16. That Chapter 8, Title 57, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 57-830, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
57-830. EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES VEHICLE AND EQUIPMENT GRANT
FUND. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the emergency medical
services vehicle and equipment grant fund to be managed by the state trea-
surer. Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys transferred to the fund pursuant to section 49-306, Idaho
Code;
(b) Legislative appropriations to the fund;
(c) Any bequests or donations to the fund; and
(d) Interest earned on idle moneys in the fund.
(2) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as is practicable, the state
controller shall transfer any unobligated moneys in the emergency medical
services fund III established in section 56-1018B, Idaho Code, to the fund
created in this section.
(3) Subject to legislative appropriation, the Idaho military division
shall use and distribute moneys from the fund as provided in section 46-905,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 17. That Section 57-2005, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
57-2005 57-831. CREATION OF TSE REGISTRY FUND -- PURPOSE TIME SENSI-
TIVE EMERGENCY REGISTRY FUND. There is hereby created and established in the
state treasury a fund to be known as the "Time Sensitive Emergencies (TSE)
Registry Fund" the time sensitive emergency registry fund to which shall be


deposited the revenues derived from grants, appropriations or other sources
of funds. All moneys now or hereafter in the TSE registry fund are hereby
dedicated for the purpose of contracting for and obtaining the services of a
continuous registry of all time sensitive emergency incident patients in the
state of Idaho and maintaining a cooperative exchange of information with
other states providing a similar TSE incident registry. The department of
health and welfare, bureau of emergency medical services and preparedness,
Idaho military division is charged with the administration of this fund for
the purposes specified herein. All claims against the fund shall be exam-
ined, audited and allowed in the manner now or hereafter provided by law for
claims against the state of Idaho.
SECTION 18. That Section 6-902A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
6-902A. SUPERVISORY PHYSICIAN. (1) For purposes of this chapter only,
a supervisory physician shall be considered an employee.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Supervisory duties" means those administrative duties of a physi-
cian who supervises personnel affiliated with a licensed ambulance or
non-transport nontransport service, including, but not limited to,
disciplining and educating personnel, setting staffing levels, emer-
gency medical services system design, establishing patient care guide-
lines and medical policies, compliance, establishing standing orders
and protocols, reviewing performance of personnel, quality management
and other reasonably necessary administrative duties.
(b) "Supervisory physician" means a physician licensed pursuant
to chapter 18, title 54, Idaho Code, who supervises the activities
of personnel affiliated with a licensed ambulance or non-transport
nontransport service as described in section 56-1011, Idaho Code, et
seq. chapter 9, title 46, Idaho Code, when the licensed ambulance or
non-transport nontransport service is operated under the control of a
governmental authority.
(3) The exceptions to liability set forth in sections 6-904, 6-904A and
6-904B, Idaho Code, shall not be applicable to a claim against a supervisory
physician for failure to properly perform supervisory duties. The liabil-
ity limit contained in section 6-926, Idaho Code, shall not be applicable to
a claim against a supervisory physician for failure to properly perform su-
pervisory duties to the extent that such supervisory physician is covered by
liability insurance exceeding that limit.
(4) Claims against a supervisory physician for failure to properly per-
form supervisory duties shall not be subject to the requirements of chapter
10, title 6, Idaho Code.
SECTION 19. That Section 9-203, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
9-203. CONFIDENTIAL RELATIONS AND COMMUNICATIONS. There are particu-
lar relations in which it is the policy of the law to encourage confidence and
to preserve it inviolate; therefore, a person cannot be examined as a witness
in the following cases:


(1) A husband cannot be examined for or against his wife, without her
consent, nor a wife for or against her husband, without his consent; nor can
either, during the marriage or afterwards, be, without the consent of the
other, examined as to any communication made by one to the other during the
marriage; but this exception does not apply to a civil action or proceeding
by one against the other nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime
committed by violence of one against the person of the other, nor does this
exception apply to any case of physical injury to a child where the injury has
been caused as a result of physical abuse or neglect by one or both of the par-
ents, nor does this exception apply to any case of lewd and lascivious con-
duct or attempted lewd and lascivious conduct where either party would oth-
erwise be protected by this privilege.
(2) An attorney cannot, without the consent of his client, be exam-
ined as to any communication made by the client to him, or his advice given
thereon, in the course of professional employment. The word client used
herein shall be deemed to include a person, a corporation or an association.
(3) A clergyman or priest cannot, without the consent of the person mak-
ing the confession, be examined as to any confession made to him in his pro-
fessional character in the course of discipline enjoined by the church to
which he belongs.
(4) A physician or surgeon cannot, without the consent of his patient,
be examined in a civil action as to any information acquired in attending the
patient which that was necessary to enable him to prescribe or act for the
patient,; provided, however, that:
(a) Nothing herein contained shall be deemed to preclude physicians
from reporting of and testifying at all cases of physical injury to
children, where it appears the injury has been caused as a result of
physical abuse or neglect by a parent, guardian or legal custodian of
the child.
(b) Nothing herein contained shall be deemed to preclude physicians
from testifying at all cases of physical injury to a person where it ap-
pears the injury has been caused as a result of domestic violence.
(c) After the death of a patient, in any action involving the valid-
ity of any will or other instrument executed, or claimed to have been
executed, by him, conveying or transferring any real or personal prop-
erty or incurring any financial obligation, such physician or surgeon
may testify to the mental or physical condition of such patient and in so
testifying may disclose information acquired by him concerning such pa-
tient which that was necessary to enable him to prescribe or act for such
deceased.
(d) Where any person, or his heirs or representatives, brings an action
to recover damages for personal injuries or death, such action shall be
deemed to constitute a consent by the person bringing such action that
any physician who has prescribed for or treated said injured or deceased
person and whose testimony is material in the action may testify.
(e) If the patient be is dead and during his lifetime had not given such
consent, the bringing of an action by a beneficiary, assignee or payee
or by the legal representative of the insured to recover on any life,
health or accident insurance policy shall constitute a consent by such


beneficiary, assignee, payee or legal representative to the testimony
of any physician who attended the deceased.
(5) A public officer cannot be examined as to communications made to him
in official confidence when the public interests would suffer by disclosure.
(6) Any certificated counselor, psychologist, or psychological exam-
iner duly appointed, regularly employed, and designated in such capacity by
any public or private school in this state for the purpose of counseling stu-
dents shall be immune from disclosing, without the consent of the student,
any communication made by any student so counseled or examined in any civil
or criminal action to which such student is a party. Such matters so communi-
cated shall be privileged and protected against disclosure.
(7) Any parent, guardian, or legal custodian shall not be forced to dis-
close any communication made to such parent, guardian, or legal custodian by
their minor child or ward to them concerning matters in any civil or criminal
action to which such child or ward is a party. Such matters so communicated
shall be privileged and protected against disclosure; excepting however,
this section does not apply to a civil action or proceeding by one against
the other nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime committed by
violence of one against the person of the other, nor does this section apply
to any case of physical injury to a minor child where the injury has been
caused as a result of physical abuse or neglect by one or both of the parents,
guardians, or legal custodians.
(8)(a) As used in this subsection:
(i) "First responder" means:
1. A peace officer as defined in section 19-5101(d), Idaho
Code, when employed by a city, county, or the Idaho state po-
lice;
2. A firefighter as defined in section 59-1302(16), Idaho
Code;
3. A volunteer emergency responder as defined in section
72-102(31), Idaho Code;
4. An emergency medical service (EMS) provider or an ambu-
lance-based clinician certified by the department of health
and welfare pursuant to sections 56-1011 through 56-1018B,
Idaho Code, and an ambulance-based clinician as defined in
the rules governing emergency medical services as adopted
by the department of health and welfare chapter 9, title 46,
Idaho Code; and
5. An emergency communications officer as defined in sec-
tion 19-5101(f), Idaho Code.
(ii) "Peer support counseling session" means a meeting conducted
by a peer support specialist, which meeting is held in response to
a critical incident, traumatic event, or other personal or profes-
sional wellness issue.
(iii) "Peer support specialist" means a person designated by a
public agency employing first responders to lead, moderate, or
assist in a peer support counseling session.
(b) Any peer support specialist or participant in a peer support coun-
seling session cannot disclose and shall not be forced to disclose a
communication made during or arising out of a peer support counseling


session without the consent of the person who made the communication or
about whom the communication was made, unless the communication:
(i) Involves a threat of suicide or a threat to commit a criminal
act;
(ii) Involves information required by law to be reported; or
(iii) Is an admission of criminal conduct.
(c) Any disclosure permitted by paragraph (b) of this subsection that
is made during or as part of court proceedings is subject to the rules of
the Idaho supreme court.
(9) A person employed by or volunteering at a nongovernmental domestic
or sexual violence program shall not, without the written and signed consent
of the recipient of services, be required to or compelled to disclose any
communication made between the person in the course of employment or volun-
teer services for the domestic or sexual violence program and a recipient of
the program's services or to disclose information or records about a recip-
ient of the services of a domestic or sexual violence program, provided that
disclosure of communications during or as part of court proceedings is sub-
ject to the rules of the Idaho supreme court. The provisions of this subsec-
tion shall not apply to communications made to a provider or employee during
medical services, medical procedures, medical exams, medical evaluations,
or forensic interviews.
(10) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Recipient" means any individual who has received or inquired about
receiving services or assistance from a domestic or sexual violence
program, including shelter, advocacy, counseling, or other services
offered by a domestic or sexual violence program.
(b) "Domestic or sexual violence program" means any nonprofit or-
ganization, nongovernmental organization, private entity, or tribe
or tribal organization that has as its primary purpose the operation
of shelters or supportive services for victims of domestic or sexual
violence and their dependents or counseling, advocacy, or self-help
services to victims of domestic or sexual violence.
SECTION 20. That Section 18-915, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-915. ASSAULT OR BATTERY UPON CERTAIN PERSONNEL -- PUNISHMENT. (1)
Any person who commits a crime provided for in this chapter against or upon
a justice, judge, magistrate, prosecuting attorney, public defender, peace
officer, bailiff, marshal, sheriff, police officer, peace officer standards
and training employee involved in peace officer decertification activi-
ties, emergency services dispatcher, correctional officer, employee of the
department of correction, employee of a private prison contractor while
employed at a private correctional facility in the state of Idaho, members
or employees of the commission of pardons and parole, employees of the de-
partment of water resources authorized to enforce the provisions of chapter
38, title 42, Idaho Code, employees of the department of parks and recreation
authorized to enforce the provisions of chapter 42, title 67, Idaho Code,
employees of a public utility as described in section 61-129, Idaho Code,
including any employee of a consumer-owned utility, jailer, parole officer,
misdemeanor probation officer, officer of the Idaho state police, fireman,


social caseworkers or social work specialists of the department of health
and welfare, employee of a state secure confinement facility for juveniles,
employee of a juvenile detention facility, a teacher at a detention facil-
ity or a juvenile probation officer, emergency medical services personnel
licensed under the provisions of chapter 10, title 56, chapter 9, title 46,
Idaho Code, a member, employee or agent of the state tax commission, United
States marshal, or federally commissioned law enforcement officer or their
deputies or agents, and the perpetrator knows or has reason to know of the
victim's status, the punishment shall be as follows:
(a) For committing battery with intent to commit a serious felony,
the punishment shall be imprisonment in the state prison not to exceed
twenty-five (25) years.
(b) For committing any other crime in this chapter, the punishment
shall be doubled that provided in the respective section, except as pro-
vided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(2) For committing a violation of the provisions of section 18-901 or
18-903, Idaho Code, against the person of a former or present justice, judge
or magistrate, jailer or correctional officer or other staff of the depart-
ment of correction, or of a county jail, or of a private correctional facil-
ity, or of an employee of a state secure confinement facility for juveniles,
an employee of a juvenile detention facility, a teacher at a detention facil-
ity, misdemeanor probation officer, a juvenile probation officer, or member
or employee of the commission of pardons and parole:
(a) Because of the exercise of official duties or because of the vic-
tim's former or present official status; or
(b) While the victim is engaged in the performance of his duties and the
person committing the offense knows or reasonably should know that such
victim is a justice, judge or magistrate, jailer or correctional offi-
cer or other staff of the department of correction, or of a private cor-
rectional facility, an employee of a state secure confinement facility
for juveniles, an employee of a juvenile detention facility, a teacher
at a detention facility, misdemeanor probation officer or a juvenile
probation officer;
the offense shall be a felony punishable by imprisonment in a correctional
facility for a period of not more than five (5) years, and said sentence shall
be served consecutively to any sentence being currently served.
(3) For committing a violation of the provisions of section 18-903,
Idaho Code, except unlawful touching as described in section 18-903(b),
Idaho Code, against the person of a former or present peace officer, sheriff
or police officer:
(a) Because of the exercise of official duty or because of the victim's
former or present official status; or
(b) While the victim is engaged in the performance of his duties and the
person committing the offense knows or reasonably should know that such
victim is a peace officer, sheriff or police officer;
the offense shall be a felony punishable by imprisonment in a correctional
facility for a period of not more than five (5) years, and said sentence shall
be served consecutively to any sentence being currently served.
SECTION 21. That Section 31-3908, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


31-3908. AMBULANCE DISTRICT AUTHORIZED -- DISTRICTS FORMED BEFORE
JULY 1, 2020. The provisions set forth in this section shall govern an ambu-
lance district formed prior to July 1, 2020:
(1) The county commissioners of any county shall, upon petition signed
by not less than fifty (50) qualified electors of said county, or any por-
tion thereof, which may exclude incorporated cities, undertake the follow-
ing procedure to determine the advisability of resolving to establish and
maintain an ambulance service district within the county as may be desig-
nated in the petition.
(a) A petition to form an ambulance service district shall be presented
to the county clerk and recorder. The petition shall be signed by not
less than fifty (50) of the resident real property holders within the
proposed district. The petition shall designate the boundaries of the
district.
(b) The petition shall be filed with the county clerk and recorder of
the county in which the signers of the petition are located. Upon the
filing of the petition, the county clerk shall examine the petition
and certify whether the required number of petitioners have signed the
petition. If the number of petition signers is sufficient, the clerk
shall transmit the petition to the board of county commissioners.
(c) Upon receipt of a duly certified petition, the board of county com-
missioners shall cause the text of the petition to be published once a
week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general
circulation within the county. With the publication of the petition,
there shall be published a notice of the time of the meeting of the board
of county commissioners when the petition will be considered stating
that all persons interested may appear and be heard. No more than five
(5) names attached to the petition shall appear in the publication and
notice, but the number of signatures shall be stated.
At the time of filing the petition, the sponsors thereof shall cause
to be deposited with the county clerk a sufficient sum of money to cover
the cost of publication of the petition and all necessary notices. If
the petition and notices are not published, the deposit shall be re-
turned to whomever deposited the funds, and if there is any surplus
remaining after paying for the publication as herein provided, it shall
be returned to the original depositors, and if a district is created,
the fees so expended are an obligation of the district and shall be re-
paid by the district to the depositors.
(d) At the time set for hearing the petition, the board of county com-
missioners shall hear all persons who desire to be heard relative to the
creation of an ambulance service district. The board of county commis-
sioners may, if they so desire and it appears desirable, adjourn the
meeting for not to exceed thirty (30) days to further hear the petition-
ers and protestants, if any. After the hearing or hearings, the board
of county commissioners shall adopt a resolution either creating the
proposed ambulance service district or denying the petition. When the
board of county commissioners creates an ambulance service district,
the board shall adopt a resolution describing the boundaries of the dis-
trict.


(e) When the board of county commissioners adopts the resolution creat-
ing the ambulance service district, the board shall include in the reso-
lution the name of the district and file a copy of the order creating the
district with the county clerk and recorder, for which the clerk shall
receive a fee of three dollars ($3.00).
(f) Procedures for annexation, deannexation, or dissolution of a dis-
trict created pursuant to this section shall be in substantial compli-
ance with the provisions for public notice and hearing provided herein
and shall be by resolution adopted by the board of county commissioners.
(2) When the board of county commissioners has ordered the creation of
an ambulance service district, pursuant to the provisions of this section,
such district is hereby recognized as a legal taxing district, and providing
ambulance service is a governmental function.
(3) The board of county commissioners shall be the governing board of an
ambulance service district created pursuant to this section and shall exer-
cise the duties and responsibilities provided in chapter 39, title 31, Idaho
Code.
(4) In any county where an ambulance service district is created as pro-
vided herein, the board of county commissioners is authorized to levy a spe-
cial tax, not to exceed four-hundredths percent (.04%) of market value for
assessment purposes, except as authorized by paragraph (a) of this subsec-
tion, upon all taxable property within the district for the purposes of the
district, but the levy otherwise authorized in section 31-3901, Idaho Code,
shall not be made on taxable property within the district.
(a) In any county where an ambulance service district:
(i) Was created as of January 1, 1976;
(ii) Had at the time of its creation a market value for assessment
purposes of the district of less than three hundred million dol-
lars ($300,000,000); and
(iii) The service provided by the district is an advanced life sup-
port paramedic unit;
the board of county commissioners may submit to the electors within the
district the question of whether the levy authorized in this subsec-
tion may be increased to a levy not to exceed six-hundredths percent
(.06%) of market value for assessment purposes upon all taxable prop-
erty within the district for the purposes of the district, if approved
by a minimum of two-thirds (2/3) of the qualified electors of the dis-
trict voting at an election called for that purpose and held on the May
or November dates provided in section 34-106, Idaho Code, but the levy
otherwise authorized in section 31-3901, Idaho Code, shall not be made
on taxable property within the district.
(5) The board of county commissioners is authorized by resolution to
create an ambulance district capital improvement account. The board may
dedicate all or a portion of the fees and taxes collected pursuant to this
chapter to the capital improvement account for the purpose of purchasing
necessary buildings, land or equipment for the operation of the district.
The board is further authorized to carry over and add to the funds in the
account from year to year in order to make the purchases authorized by this
subsection.


(6) The board of county commissioners is authorized by resolution to
enter into cooperative agreements with other adjoining counties, adjoining
fire protection districts, or other adjoining political subdivisions in
Idaho or in other states in order to pool resources and increase efficiency
and improve emergency medical services.
(7) As used in this chapter, "ambulance district" or "ambulance service
district" means a political subdivision formed to provide ambulance trans-
port, emergency medical services as defined in section 56-1012 46-903, Idaho
Code, community health emergency medical services as defined in section
56-1012 46-903, Idaho Code, and/or other activities necessary to meet the
community health needs of the district.
SECTION 22. That Section 33-4302, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-4302. ARMED FORCES AND PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER SCHOLARSHIPS.
(1)(a) The following individuals shall be eligible for the scholarship
program provided for in this section:
(i) Any spouse or child of any Idaho resident who entered active
service as an Idaho resident as indicated on a DD form 214 cer-
tificate of release or discharge from active duty and, while such
service member is, or was if deceased, a resident of the state of
Idaho:
1. Has been determined by the federal government to be a
prisoner of war or missing in action; or
2. Died of, or is determined to be unemployable due to, in-
juries or wounds sustained during active duty or inactive
duty training;
(ii) Any spouse or child of any member of the United States armed
forces who is stationed in the state of Idaho on military orders
and who:
1. Is deployed from the state of Idaho to any area of armed
conflict in which the United States is a party and who has
been determined by the federal government to be a prisoner of
war or missing in action or has died of or is determined to be
unemployable due to injuries or wounds sustained in action
as a result of such deployment; or
2. Dies of, or is determined to be unemployable due to, in-
juries or wounds sustained during active duty or inactive
duty training; and
(iii) Any spouse or child of a full-time or part-time public safety
officer, as defined in paragraph (b) of this subsection, employed
by or volunteering for the state of Idaho or for a political sub-
division of the state of Idaho, which public safety officer is or
was a resident of the state of Idaho at the time such officer was
killed or totally and permanently disabled in the line of duty.
The scholarship provided for in this section shall not be avail-
able unless it is determined that:
1. The death or disablement of the public safety officer oc-
curred in the performance of the officer's duties;


2. The death or disablement was not caused by the inten-
tional misconduct of the public safety officer or by such
officer's intentional infliction of injury; and
3. The public safety officer was not voluntarily intoxi-
cated at the time of death.
(b) As used in this section:
(i) "Active duty" means state active duty as defined in section
46-409, Idaho Code, or full-time duty with any of the United States
armed forces.
(ii) "Inactive duty training" means training or maintenance ac-
tivities prescribed, required, or authorized for military members
that do not constitute active duty.
(iii) "Military member" means a member of the United States armed
forces.
(iv) "Public safety officer" means a peace officer, a fire-
fighter, or a paramedic as defined in section 56-1012, Idaho Code,
or an, emergency medical responder, emergency medical technician,
or advanced emergency medical technician as defined in section
56-1012 46-903, Idaho Code.
(v) "United States armed forces" means the air force, army, coast
guard, marine corps, navy, or space force, or the reserve compo-
nent of any such service.
(vi) "Volunteering" means contributing services as a bona fide
member of a legally organized law enforcement agency, fire depart-
ment, or licensed emergency medical service provider organiza-
tion.
(2)(a) To be eligible for the scholarship provided for in this section,
a child of a military member or a public safety officer must be a res-
ident of the state of Idaho and must have completed secondary school
or its equivalent in the state of Idaho. A child already born, or born
after a military member or public safety officer is determined to be
imprisoned or missing in action, or dies or becomes totally and perma-
nently disabled, shall be eligible for this scholarship.
(b) To be eligible for the scholarship provided for in this section,
the spouse of a military member or public safety officer must be a res-
ident of the state of Idaho and must have been married to such person at
the time the military member or public safety officer was determined to
be imprisoned or missing in action or died or became totally and perma-
nently disabled. However, in the situation of disability, the spouse
must be currently married to such person.
(3) An eligible individual who applies for the scholarship provided
for in this section shall, after verification of eligibility, receive the
scholarship and be admitted to attend undergraduate studies at any public
institution of higher education or public career technical college within
the state of Idaho without the necessity of paying tuition and fees therefor;
such student shall be provided with books, equipment, and supplies necessary
for pursuit of such program of enrollment not to exceed seven hundred fifty
dollars ($750) per quarter, semester, intensified semester, or like edu-
cational period; and such student shall be furnished on-campus institution
housing and subsistence for each month he or she is enrolled full-time under


this program and actually resides in such on-campus facility. However, such
undergraduate educational benefits shall not exceed a total of thirty-six
(36) months or four (4) nine (9) month periods. Effective July 1, 2022, the
initiation of such educational benefits shall extend for a period of nine-
teen (19) years after achieving a high school diploma or its equivalency or
for a period of ten (10) years after the event giving rise to the eligibility
for the scholarship, whichever is longer.
(4) The eligible individual shall meet such other educational qualifi-
cations as such institution of higher education or career technical college
has established for other prospective students of this state, as well as any
additional educational qualifications established by the state board of ed-
ucation and board of regents of the university of Idaho.
(5) Application for eligibility under this section shall be made to the
state board of education and the board of regents of the university of Idaho
or the state board for career technical education. The board shall verify
the eligibility of the applicant and communicate such eligibility to such
person and the affected institution or college.
(6) Affected institutions shall in their preparation of future budgets
include costs resultant from such tuition, fee, book, equipment, supply,
housing and subsistence loss for reimbursement from appropriations of state
funds.
(7) For purposes of this section, a member of the United States armed
forces is considered unemployable if at the time of application:
(a) The United States department of veterans affairs has made a deter-
mination of individual unemployability; or
(b) The United States social security administration has made or recog-
nized a determination of total and permanent disability, and the deter-
mination is based on injuries or wounds sustained during active duty or
inactive duty training.
(8) For the purposes of this section, a public safety officer is consid-
ered totally and permanently disabled if at the time of application a current
disability determination made by the public employee retirement system of
Idaho is in effect with respect to such individual.
(9) The state board of education and board of regents of the university
of Idaho may adopt rules to implement and administer the scholarship program
provided for in this section.
SECTION 23. That Section 39-1392a, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
39-1392a. DEFINITIONS. The following terms shall have the following
meanings when used in this section:
(1) "Emergency medical services personnel" means emergency medical
services providers certified by the department of health and welfare pur-
suant to section 56-1011 et seq. and ambulance-based clinicians licensed
pursuant to chapter 9, title 46, Idaho Code, and ambulance-based clinicians
as defined in the rules governing emergency medical services as promulgated
by the department of health and welfare.
(2) "Group medical practice" means a partnership, corporation, limited
liability company, or other association formed for the purpose of offering
health care services through physicians and other licensed or otherwise au-


thorized health care providers who are partners, shareholders, members, em-
ployees, or contractors of such group medical practice.
(3) "Health care organization" means a hospital, in-hospital medical
staff committee, medical society, managed care organization, licensed emer-
gency medical service, group medical practice, residential care facility or
skilled nursing facility.
(4) "Hospital" means a facility in Idaho licensed under sections
39-1301 through 39-1314, Idaho Code, and defined in section 39-1301(a)(1),
Idaho Code.
(5) "In-hospital medical staff committees" means any individual doctor
who is a hospital staff member, or any hospital employee, or any group of such
doctors and/or hospital employees, who are duly designated a committee by
hospital staff bylaws, by action of an organized hospital staff, or by action
of the board of directors of a hospital, and which committee is authorized
by said bylaws, staff or board of directors, to conduct research or study of
hospital patient cases, or of medical questions or problems using data and
information from hospital patient cases.
(6) "Licensed emergency medical service" means an ambulance service or
a nontransport service licensed by the department of health and welfare pur-
suant to section 56-1011 et seq. pursuant to chapter 9, title 46, Idaho Code.
(7) "Managed care organization" means a public or private person or or-
ganization which that offers a managed care plan.
(8) "Managed care plan" means a contract of coverage given to an indi-
vidual, family or group of covered individuals pursuant to which a member is
entitled to receive a defined set of health care benefits through an orga-
nized system of health care providers in exchange for defined consideration
and which requires the member to use, or creates financial incentives for the
member to use, health care providers owned, managed, employed by or under
contract with the managed care organization.
(9) "Medical society" means any duly constituted, authorized and rec-
ognized professional society or entity made up of physicians licensed to
practice medicine in Idaho, having as its purpose the maintenance of high
quality in the standards of health care provided in Idaho or any region or
segment of the state, operating with the approval of the Idaho state board
of medicine, or any official committee appointed by the Idaho state board of
medicine.
(10) "Patient care records" means written or otherwise recorded, pre-
served and maintained records of the medical or surgical diagnostic, clini-
cal, or therapeutic care of any patient treated by or under the direction of
licensed professional personnel, including emergency medical services per-
sonnel, in every health care organization subject to this act, whether as an
inpatient or outpatient of the health care organization.
(11) "Peer review" means the collection, interpretation and analysis of
data by a health care organization for the purpose of bettering the system
of delivery of health care or to improve the provision of health care or to
otherwise reduce patient morbidity and mortality and improve the quality of
patient care. Peer review activities by a health care organization include,
without limitation:
(a) Credentialing, privileging or affiliating of health care providers
as members of, or providers for, a health care organization;


(b) Quality assurance and improvement, patient safety investigations
and analysis, patient adverse outcome reviews, and root-cause analysis
and investigation activities by a health care organization; and
(c) Professional review action, meaning an action or recommendation
of a health care organization which is taken or made in the conduct of
peer review, that is based on the competence or professional conduct of
an individual physician or emergency medical services personnel where
such conduct adversely affects or could adversely affect the health
or welfare of a patient or the physician's privileges, employment or
membership in the health care organization or in the case of emergency
medical services personnel, the emergency medical services personnel's
scope of practice, employment or membership in the health care organ-
ization.
(12) "Peer review records" means all evidence of interviews, reports,
statements, minutes, memoranda, notes, investigative graphs and compila-
tions and the contents thereof, and all physical materials relating to peer
review of any health care organization. "Peer review records" does not mean
or include patient care records; provided however, that the records relating
to the identification of which particular patient care records were selected
for, or reviewed, examined or discussed in peer review by a health care or-
ganization and the methodology used for selecting such records shall be con-
sidered peer review records.
(13) "Skilled nursing facility" means a facility licensed under chapter
13, title 39, Idaho Code, to provide skilled care to recipients.
SECTION 24. That Section 39-1393, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1393. NOTIFICATION OF PROFESSIONAL REVIEW ACTION IMPOSED UPON
PHYSICIAN OR EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES PERSONNEL. (1) Any health care or-
ganization in this state that is by law required to conduct peer review or
which voluntarily formally elects to conduct professional review actions
shall notify the board of medicine of professional review actions taken
against physicians licensed in Idaho required to be reported as provided in
this section. Such reports shall be made to the board of medicine within fif-
teen (15) days of completion of the professional review action by the health
care organization. For emergency medical services personnel, such reports
shall be made to the department of health and welfare Idaho military division
within fifteen (15) days of completion of the professional review action by
the health care organization. Such required reports shall be made on forms
approved by the board of medicine for reports concerning physicians, or the
department of health and welfare Idaho military division for reports con-
cerning emergency medical services personnel, consistent with the reporting
requirements of this section. The reporting obligation shall not be stayed
by the filing of any court proceeding unless otherwise ordered by the court.
(2) A health care organization in Idaho shall report to the board of
medicine if it:
(a) Takes a professional review action against a physician licensed in
Idaho and imposes a sanction of the type included in subsection (3) of
this section which lasts longer than thirty (30) days; or


(b) Accepts a voluntary sanction by a physician licensed in Idaho of the
type identified in subsection (3) of this section while the physician is
under investigation or to avoid investigation by the health care organ-
ization relating to the professional competence or professional con-
duct of the physician or in exchange for the health care organization
not conducting such an investigation or initiating a professional re-
view action, if the sanction lasts longer than thirty (30) days.
(3) Professional review action sanctions against a physician which
must be reported to the board of medicine pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section, whether voluntary or involuntary, shall be:
(a) Restriction or limitation of privileges;
(b) Revocation of privileges;
(c) Suspension of privileges;
(d) Reduction of privileges;
(e) Denial of a request for initial privileges;
(f) Submission to monitoring of the physician's physical or mental con-
dition;
(g) Submission to monitoring of the physician's delivery of medical
services other than to assess and monitor the physician's qualifica-
tions for new or additional privileges;
(h) Surrender of privileges;
(i) Summary suspension or reduction of privileges lasting longer than
thirty (30) days;
(j) Termination of employment;
(k) Suspension of employment lasting longer than thirty (30) days.
(4) The reporting requirements of this section shall not apply to:
(a) Actions based on compliance with medical records or confidential-
ity requirements of a health care organization;
(b) Voluntary requests for assistance or monitoring by a physician as
part of an educational process to improve physician skills or enhance
patient care when unrelated to a professional review action concerning
the quality or necessity of patient medical care;
(c) Voluntary or involuntary revocation, nonrenewal, denial, reduc-
tion, restriction, resignation, or limitation of privileges or employ-
ment of a physician based upon factors not directly impacting the qual-
ity of patient care or safety of practice of the physician;
(d) Adverse actions taken against a physician by a health care organ-
ization that is not required by law to conduct peer review and that has
not voluntarily formally elected to conduct professional review ac-
tions; and
(e) The denial of a physician's request for additional privileges or
credentials with a health care organization.
(5) The report to the board of medicine required by this section shall
include a statement of the quality of care concerns or professional conduct
that is the basis of the professional review action or investigation and the
reportable professional review action sanction voluntarily accepted or in-
voluntarily imposed.
(6) A health care organization required to report a professional review
action concerning a physician to the board of medicine pursuant to this sec-


tion shall, if requested by the board of medicine, provide to the board the
following:
(a) A statement of the specific quality of care concerns or profes-
sional conduct which resulted in the professional review action sanc-
tion;
(b) A statement of the specific professional review action sanction;
and
(c) Any patient care records of the health care organization regard-
ing the care provided by the reported physician. However, the board
of medicine may not request or require production of any peer review
records from any person or health care organization, including the
identification of which particular patient care records were selected
for, or reviewed, examined or discussed in any peer review activity of a
health care organization, or the method used by the health care organi-
zation to select such patient care records for peer review.
(7) The records lawfully requested by the board of medicine pursuant
to subsection (6) of this section shall be provided by the health care or-
ganization without a subpoena or court order. If the health care organiza-
tion fails to comply with the board of medicine's lawful request, the board
may petition the district court for an order compelling compliance with the
board's request, which shall be granted if disclosure is required by law.
(8) Professional review action sanctions against emergency medical
services personnel, whether voluntary or involuntary, which are the result
of any action, conduct, or failure to act which is inconsistent with the pro-
fessionalism and/or standards established in the rules governing emergency
medical services personnel as promulgated by the department of health and
welfare must be reported to the department of health and welfare. by the
Idaho military division must be reported to the Idaho military division.
(9) The report to the department of health and welfare Idaho military
division required by this section shall include a statement of the quality of
care concerns or professional conduct that is the basis of the professional
review action or investigation and the reportable professional review ac-
tion sanction voluntarily accepted or involuntarily imposed.
(10) Any person or health care organization that provides notification
as required by law, or in a good faith belief that such notification is re-
quired by law, shall be immune from any civil or other liability arising from
providing the notification. Such immunity shall likewise pertain to the
provision of files, records and information a health care organization may
in good faith provide to the board of medicine pursuant to this section or
other applicable law. Such materials provided to the board of medicine shall
be subject to disclosure by the board according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho
Code, and available only to the board of medicine and its staff unless and
until such matter becomes the subject of formal proceedings by or before the
board of medicine or authorized by it.
SECTION 25. That Section 39-4703, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-4703. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:


(1) "Accident" means any event that results in an unintended injury or
property damage attributable directly or indirectly to the motion of a motor
vehicle or its load, a snowmobile, or special mobile equipment.
(2) "Department" means the department of health and welfare.
(3) "Driver" means every person who drives or is in actual physical con-
trol of a vehicle.
(4) "Emergency medical responder" means:
(a) Emergency medical services licensed personnel as defined in sec-
tion 56-1012(19) licensed pursuant to chapter 9, title 46, Idaho Code;
or
(b) A physician, nurse, or other health care provider on the scene of
a motor vehicle accident or emergency situation as provided in section
39-4708, Idaho Code, or who is accompanying or attending a patient re-
moved from such an accident or emergency situation in an ambulance.
(5) "Motor vehicle" or "vehicle" means every vehicle that is self-pro-
pelled and, for the purpose of titling and registration meets federal motor
vehicle safety standards as defined in section 49-107, Idaho Code. Motor ve-
hicle does not include vehicles moved solely by human power, electric per-
sonal assistive mobility devices, personal delivery devices, electric-as-
sisted bicycles, and motorized wheelchairs or other such vehicles that are
specifically exempt from titling or registration requirements under title
49, Idaho Code.
(6) "Other responder" means a firefighter, peace officer, or other law
enforcement personnel on the scene.
(7) "Peace officer" means any employee of a police or law enforcement
agency that is a part of or administered by the state or any political subdi-
vision thereof and whose duties include and primarily consist of the preven-
tion and detection of crime and the enforcement of penal, traffic, or highway
laws of this state or any political subdivision of this state.
(8) "Yellow dot motor vehicle medical information program" or "yellow
dot program" means the program established pursuant to this chapter.
SECTION 26. That Section 39-8202, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-8202. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter, the following terms
shall mean:
(1) "Custodial parent," for the purposes of this chapter, means, in the
absence of a court decree, the parent with whom the child resides.
(2) "Newborn safety device" means a device that is voluntarily in-
stalled in a supporting wall of a hospital, fire station, law enforcement
agency, or medical services provider that is staffed twenty-four (24) hours
per day and that has an exterior point of access allowing an individual to
place a newborn infant inside and an interior point of access allowing indi-
viduals inside the building to safely retrieve the newborn infant.
(3) "Safe haven" means:
(a) Hospitals licensed in the state of Idaho;
(b) Licensed physicians in the state of Idaho and staff working at their
offices and clinics;
(c) Advanced practice professional nurses, including certified nurse-
midwives, clinical nurse specialists, nurse practitioners and certi-


fied registered nurse anesthetists licensed or registered pursuant to
chapter 14, title 54, Idaho Code;
(d) Physician assistants licensed pursuant to chapter 18, title 54,
Idaho Code;
(e) Medical personnel acting or serving in the capacity as a licensed
provider, affiliated with a recognized Idaho EMS agency. For purposes
of this act, "medical personnel" shall include those individuals certi-
fied by the department of health and welfare Idaho military division as:
(i) First responders;
(ii) Emergency medical technicians - basic;
(iii) Advanced emergency medical technicians - ambulance;
(iv) Emergency medical technicians - intermediate; and
(v) Emergency medical technicians - paramedic; and
(f) A fire station operated by a city, a county, a tribal entity, a fire
protection district or a volunteer fire department if there are person-
nel on duty.
SECTION 27. That Section 46-1007, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
46-1007. LIMITATIONS. Nothing in this act shall be construed to:
(1) Interfere with the course or conduct of a labor dispute, except that
actions otherwise authorized by this act or other laws may be taken when nec-
essary to forestall or mitigate imminent or existing danger to public health
or safety;
(2) Interfere with dissemination of news or comment on public affairs;
(3) Affect the jurisdiction or responsibilities of police forces, fire
fighting forces, local emergency medical service (EMS) agencies licensed by
the state department of health and welfare EMS bureau Idaho military divi-
sion, units of the armed forces of the United States, or of any personnel
thereof, when on active duty; but state, local, and intergovernmental disas-
ter emergency plans shall place reliance upon the forces available for per-
formance of functions related to disaster emergencies; or
(4) Limit, modify, or abridge the authority of the governor to proclaim
martial law or exercise any other powers vested in him under the constitution
or statutes of this state independent of or in conjunction with any provi-
sions of this act.
SECTION 28. That Section 49-123, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-123. DEFINITIONS -- V. (1) "Variable load suspension axle" means an
axle or axles designed to support a part of the vehicle and load and which
can be regulated to vary the amount of load supported by such an axle or axles
and which can be deployed or lifted by the operator of the vehicle. (See also
section 49-117, Idaho Code)
(a) "Fully raised" means that the variable load suspension axle is in
an elevated position preventing the tires on such axle from having any
contact with the roadway.


(b) "Fully deployed" means that the variable load suspension axle is
supporting a portion of the weight of the loaded vehicle as controlled
by the preset pressure regulator valve.
(2) "Vehicle" means:
(a) General. Every device in, upon, or by which any person or property
is or may be transported or drawn upon a highway, excepting devices used
exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.
(b) Assembled vehicle or vessel. A vehicle or vessel, not including a
salvage vehicle or vessel, that has been constructed using major compo-
nent parts from two (2) or more vehicles or vessels or that has been re-
paired using new factory major component parts so that the resulting ve-
hicle or vessel has the same appearance as a vehicle or vessel that was
manufactured under a specific make and model by a manufacturer. A vehi-
cle or vessel utilizing a kit for the entire body or a glider kit vehicle
is not an assembled vehicle.
(c) Authorized emergency vehicle. Vehicles operated by any fire
department or law enforcement agency of the state of Idaho or any po-
litical subdivision of the state, ambulances, vehicles belonging to
personnel of voluntary fire departments while in performance of offi-
cial duties only, vehicles belonging to or operated by EMS personnel
certified or otherwise recognized by the EMS bureau of the Idaho de-
partment of health and welfare Idaho military division while in the
performance of emergency medical services, sheriff's search and rescue
vehicles that are under the immediate supervision of the county sher-
iff, wreckers that are engaged in motor vehicle recovery operations
and are blocking part or all of one (1) or more lanes of traffic, other
emergency vehicles designated by the director of the Idaho state police
or vehicles authorized by the Idaho transportation board and used in the
enforcement of laws specified in section 40-510, Idaho Code, pertaining
to vehicles of ten thousand (10,000) pounds or greater.
(d) Commercial vehicle or commercial motor vehicle. For the purposes
of chapters 3 and 9 of this title, driver's licenses and vehicle equip-
ment, a motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles designed or used
to transport passengers or property if the motor vehicle:
(i) Has a manufacturer's gross combination weight rating (GCWR)
in excess of twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds inclusive of
a towed unit with a manufacturer's gross vehicle weight rating
(GVWR) of more than ten thousand (10,000) pounds; or
(ii) Has a manufacturer's gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) in
excess of twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds; or
(iii) Is designed to transport sixteen (16) or more people, in-
cluding the driver; or
(iv) Is of any size and is used in the transportation of materials
found to be hazardous for the purposes of the hazardous material
transportation act and which require the motor vehicle to be plac-
arded under the hazardous materials regulations (49 CFR part 172,
subpart F).
For the purposes of chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, motor vehicle
registration, a vehicle or combination of vehicles of a type used or
maintained for the transportation of persons for hire, compensation or


profit, or the transportation of property for the owner of the vehicle,
or for hire, compensation, or profit, and shall include fixed load spe-
cially constructed vehicles exceeding the limits imposed by chapter
10, title 49, Idaho Code, and including drilling rigs, construction,
drilling and wrecker cranes, log jammers, log loaders, and similar
vehicles which are normally operated in an overweight or oversize
condition or both, but shall not include those vehicles registered pur-
suant to sections 49-402 and 49-402A, Idaho Code, or exempted by section
49-426, Idaho Code. A motor vehicle used in a ridesharing arrangement
that has a seating capacity for not more than fifteen (15) persons,
including the driver, shall not be a "commercial vehicle" under the pro-
visions of this title relating to equipment requirements, rules of the
road, or registration.
(e) Farm vehicle. A vehicle or combination of vehicles owned by a
farmer or rancher, or by his designated agent, which are operated over
public highways, and used exclusively to transport unprocessed agri-
cultural products raised, owned or grown by the owner of the vehicle to
market or place of storage; and shall include the transportation by the
farmer or rancher of any equipment, supplies or products purchased by
that farmer or rancher for his own use, and used in the farming or ranch-
ing operation or used by a farmer partly in transporting agricultural
products or livestock from the farm of another farmer that were origi-
nally grown or raised on the farm, or when used partly in transporting
agricultural supplies, equipment, materials or livestock to the farm
of another farmer for use or consumption on the farm but not transported
for hire, and shall not include vehicles of husbandry or vehicles regis-
tered pursuant to sections 49-402 and 49-402A, Idaho Code.
(f) Foreign vehicle. Every vehicle of a type required to be registered
under the provisions of this title brought into this state from another
state, territory or country other than in the ordinary course of busi-
ness by or through a manufacturer or dealer and not registered in this
state.
(g) Glider kit vehicle. Every large truck manufactured from a kit man-
ufactured by a manufacturer of large trucks which consists of a frame,
cab complete with wiring, instruments, fenders and hood and front axles
and wheels. The "glider kit" is made into a complete assembly by the ad-
dition of the engine, transmission, rear axles, wheels and tires.
(h) Motor vehicle. Every vehicle that is self-propelled, and for the
purpose of titling and registration meets federal motor vehicle safety
standards as defined in section 49-107, Idaho Code. Motor vehicle does
not include vehicles moved solely by human power, electric personal
assistive mobility devices, personal delivery devices, electric-as-
sisted bicycles, and motorized wheelchairs or other such vehicles that
are specifically exempt from titling or registration requirements un-
der title 49, Idaho Code.
(i) Multipurpose passenger vehicle (MPV). For the purposes of section
49-966, Idaho Code, a motor vehicle designed to carry ten (10) or fewer
persons which is constructed either on a truck chassis or with special
features for occasional off-road operation.


(j) Neighborhood electric vehicle (NEV). A self-propelled, electri-
cally powered, four-wheeled motor vehicle which is emission free and
conforms to the definition and requirements for low-speed vehicles as
adopted in the federal motor vehicle safety standards for low-speed ve-
hicles under federal regulations at 49 CFR part 571. An NEV shall be ti-
tled, registered and insured according to law as provided respectively
in chapters 4, 5 and 12, title 49, Idaho Code, and shall only be operated
by a licensed driver. Operation of an NEV on a highway shall be allowed
as provided in section 49-663, Idaho Code.
(k) Noncommercial vehicle. For the purposes of chapter 4, title 49,
Idaho Code, motor vehicle registration, a noncommercial vehicle shall
not include those vehicles required to be registered under sections
49-402 and 49-402A, Idaho Code, and means all other vehicles or combi-
nations of vehicles which are not commercial vehicles or farm vehicles,
but shall include motor homes. A noncommercial vehicle shall include
those vehicles having a combined gross weight not in excess of sixty
thousand (60,000) pounds and not held out for hire, used for purposes
related to private use and not used in the furtherance of a business or
occupation for compensation or profit or for transporting goods for
other than the owner.
(l) Passenger car. For the purposes of section 49-966, Idaho Code, a
motor vehicle, except a multipurpose passenger vehicle, motorcycle or
trailer, designed to carry ten (10) or fewer persons.
(m) Rebuilt salvage vehicle or vessel. Every vehicle or vessel previ-
ously determined or declared to be a salvage vehicle that has been re-
built or repaired using like make and model parts and visually appears
as a vehicle or vessel that was originally constructed under a distinc-
tive manufacturer. This includes a salvage vehicle or vessel which is
damaged to the extent that a "rebuilt salvage" brand is required to be
added to the title.
(n) Replica vehicle or vessel. A vehicle or vessel made to replicate
any vehicle or vessel previously manufactured, using metal, fiberglass
or other composite materials. Replica vehicles must look like the orig-
inal vehicle being replicated but may use a more modern drive train. At
a minimum, replica vehicles shall meet the same federal motor vehicle
safety and emission standards in effect for the year and type of vehicle
being replicated.
(o) Salvage vehicle or vessel. Any vehicle or vessel for which a sal-
vage certificate of title, salvage bill of sale or other documentation
has been issued showing evidence that the vehicle or vessel has been de-
clared salvage or which has been damaged to the extent that the owner,
or an insurer, or other person acting on behalf of the owner, determines
that the cost of parts and labor minus the salvage value makes it uneco-
nomical to repair or rebuild. When an insurance company has paid money
or has made other monetary settlement as compensation for a total loss
of any vehicle or vessel, such vehicle shall be considered to be a sal-
vage vehicle or vessel.
(p) Specially constructed vehicle or vessel. Every vehicle or vessel
of a type required to be registered not originally constructed under a
distinctive name, make, model or type by a generally recognized man-


ufacturer of vehicles or vessels and not materially altered from its
original construction and cannot be visually identified as a vehicle or
vessel produced by a particular manufacturer. This includes:
(i) A vehicle or vessel that has been structurally modified so
that it does not have the same appearance as a similar vehicle or
vessel from the same manufacturer; or
(ii) A vehicle or vessel that has been constructed entirely from
homemade parts and materials not obtained from other vehicles or
vessels; or
(iii) A vehicle or vessel that has been constructed by using major
component parts from one (1) or more manufactured vehicles or ves-
sels and cannot be identified as a specific make or model; or
(iv) A vehicle or vessel constructed by the use of a custom kit
that cannot be visually identified as a specific make or model.
All specially constructed vehicles of a type required to be reg-
istered shall be certified by the owner to meet all applicable
federal motor vehicle safety standards in effect at the time con-
struction is completed, and all requirements of chapter 9, title
49, Idaho Code.
(q) Specialty off-highway vehicle. A specialty off-highway vehicle as
defined in section 67-7101, Idaho Code.
(r) Tank vehicle.
(i) Any commercial motor vehicle transporting, or designed to
transport, any liquid or gaseous materials within:
1. A tank that is either permanently or temporarily attached
or secured to the vehicle or chassis and has a rated capacity
of one thousand (1,000) gallons or more; or
2. Multiple tanks either permanently or temporarily at-
tached or secured, when the aggregate rated capacity of
those tanks is one thousand (1,000) gallons or more, as de-
termined by adding the capacity of each individual tank with
a capacity of more than one hundred nineteen (119) gallons.
(ii) If a commercial motor vehicle transports one (1) or more
tanks that are manifested either as empty or as residue and that
are actually empty or contain only residue, those tanks shall not
be considered in determining whether the vehicle is a tank vehi-
cle.
(s) Total loss vehicle. Every vehicle that is deemed to be uneconomi-
cal to repair. A total loss shall occur when an insurance company or any
other person pays or makes other monetary settlement to the owner when
it is deemed to be uneconomical to repair the damaged vehicle. The com-
pensation for total loss as defined herein shall not include payments
by an insurer or other person for medical care, bodily injury, vehicle
rental or for anything other than the amount paid for the actual damage
to the vehicle.
(3) "Vehicle identification number." (See "identifying number," sec-
tion 49-110, Idaho Code)
(4) "Vehicle salesman" means any person who, for a salary, commission
or compensation of any kind, is employed either directly or indirectly, or
regularly or occasionally by any dealer to sell, purchase or exchange, or to


negotiate for the sale, purchase or exchange of vehicles. (See also "full-
time salesman," section 49-107, Idaho Code, and "part-time salesman," sec-
tion 49-117, Idaho Code)
(5) "Vessel." (See section 67-7003, Idaho Code)
(6) "Veteran." (See section 65-203, Idaho Code)
(7) "Violation" means a conviction of a misdemeanor charge involving a
moving traffic violation, or an admission or judicial determination of the
commission of an infraction involving a moving traffic infraction, except
bicycle infractions.
SECTION 29. That Section 49-306, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-306. APPLICATION FOR DRIVER'S LICENSE, INSTRUCTION PERMIT,
COMMERCIAL LEARNER'S PERMIT OR RESTRICTED SCHOOL ATTENDANCE DRIVING PER-
MIT. (1) Every application for any instruction permit, restricted school
attendance driving permit, or driver's license shall be made on a form
furnished by the department and shall be verified by the applicant before
a person authorized to administer oaths. Officers and employees of the
department, agents authorized by the department, and sheriffs and their
deputies are authorized to administer the oaths without charge.
(2) Every application for a permit, extension, driver's license, or
knowledge test shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee pursuant to this
subsection. Fee portions identified as going to the current expense fund
shall be retained by the issuing entity. If the issuing entity is the depart-
ment or an agent authorized by the department, other than the county, such
fee portion shall be deposited in the state highway account. All other re-
maining fee portions shall be remitted to the state treasurer. If the fee is
collected by a county, all remaining fee portions shall be paid over to the
county treasurer and the county treasurer shall remit such fees to the state
treasurer not less than monthly. The state treasurer shall immediately al-
locate such fees in accordance with the schedule identified following each
fee:
(a) Class A, B, C (4-year) license with endorsements --
age 21 years and older ........................................$40.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $2.00 to the emergency medical services fund II established
in section 57-829, Idaho Code;
(iii) $4.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund III established in section 57-830, Idaho Code;
(iv) $28.00 to the state highway account; and
(v) $1.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(b) Class A, B, C (8-year) license with endorsements --
age 21 years and older ........................................$60.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $4.00 to the emergency medical services fund II established
in section 57-829, Idaho Code;
(iii) $8.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund III established in section 57-830, Idaho Code;
(iv) $41.00 to the state highway account; and
(v) $2.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;


(c) Class A, B, C (3-year) license with endorsements --
age 18 to 21 years ............................................$30.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $1.50 to the emergency medical services fund II established
in section 57-829, Idaho Code;
(iii) $3.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund III established in section 57-830, Idaho Code;
(iv) $19.50 to the state highway account; and
(v) $1.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(d) Class A, B, C (1-year) license with endorsements -- age
20 years ....................................................$15.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $0.50 to the emergency medical services fund II established
in section 57-829, Idaho Code;
(iii) $1.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund III established in section 57-830, Idaho Code;
(iv) $8.16 to the state highway account; and
(v) $0.34 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(e) Class D (3-year) license -- age 18 to 21 years ..............$30.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $1.50 to the emergency medical services fund II established
in section 57-829, Idaho Code;
(iii) $3.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund III established in section 57-830, Idaho Code;
(iv) $4.00 to the driver training fund;
(v) $10.50 to the highway distribution account; and
(vi) $1.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(f) Class D (1-year) license -- age 17 to 20 years ..............$20.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $0.50 to the emergency medical services fund II established
in section 57-829, Idaho Code;
(iii) $1.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund III established in section 57-830, Idaho Code;
(iv) $1.33 to the driver training fund;
(v) $6.83 to the highway distribution account; and
(vi) $0.34 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(g) Class D (4-year) license -- age 21 years and
older .......................................................$35.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $2.00 to the emergency medical services fund II established
in section 57-829, Idaho Code;
(iii) $4.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund III established in section 57-830, Idaho Code;
(iv) $5.30 to the driver training fund;
(v) $12.70 to the highway distribution account; and
(vi) $1.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(h) Class D (8-year) or class A, B, C license with
endorsements -- age 21 to 63 years .............................$60.00
(i) $15.00 to the current expense fund;


(ii) $4.00 to the emergency medical services fund II established
in section 57-829, Idaho Code;
(iii) $8.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund III established in section 57-830, Idaho Code;
(iv) $10.60 to the driver training fund;
(v) $20.40 to the highway distribution account; and
(vi) $2.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(i) Commercial learner's permit ..............................$29.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $4.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund III established in section 57-830, Idaho Code; and
(iii) $20.00 to the state highway account;
(j) Class D instruction permit and supervised instruction
permit ......................................................$20.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $2.60 to the driver training fund; and
(iii) $7.40 to the highway distribution account;
(k) Duplicate driver's license or permit ......................$20.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $2.60 to the driver training fund; and
(iii) $7.40 to the highway distribution account;
(l) Driver's license extension ...............................$10.00
(i) $2.60 to the driver training account; and
(ii) $7.40 to the state highway account;
(m) License classification change (upgrade)...................$30.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund; and
(ii) $20.00 to the state highway account;
(n) Endorsement addition ....................................$20.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund; and
(ii) $10.00 to the state highway account;
(o) Class A, B, C skills tests .................. not more than $200.00
(i) $10.00 to the state highway account; and
(ii) Remainder retained by entity administering the test;
(p) Class D skills test ......................... not more than $35.00
(i) $6.50 to the state highway account; and
(ii) Remainder retained by entity administering the test;
(q) Motorcycle endorsement skills test (amount charged retained by
entity administering the test).................. not more than $25.00;
(r) Knowledge test (fee retained by the entity administering
the test)....................................................$5.00;
(s) Seasonal driver's license ................................$44.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $2.00 to the emergency medical services fund II established
in section 57-829, Idaho Code;
(iii) $4.00 to the emergency medical services vehicle and equip-
ment grant fund III established in section 57-830, Idaho Code; and
(iv) $28.00 to the state highway account;
(t) Onetime motorcycle "M" endorsement .......................$15.00
(i) $2.50 to the current expense fund; and
(ii) $12.50 to the state highway account;


(u) Motorcycle endorsement instruction permit ................$15.00
(i) $2.50 to the current expense fund; and
(ii) $12.50 to the state highway account;
(v) Restricted driving permit or restricted school attendance
driving permit (fee to the state highway account) .............$60.00.
(3) The fee for any electronic driver's license renewal allowed pur-
suant to section 49-319(10), Idaho Code, shall be five dollars ($5.00) less
than the applicable application fee prescribed in subsection (2) of this
section. This fee reduction shall be accounted for by subtracting five dol-
lars ($5.00) from the portion of fees retained by the department.
(4) A person who applies for a driver's license or a driver's license
renewal may designate a voluntary contribution of two dollars ($2.00) for
the purpose of promoting and supporting organ donation. Such a contribution
shall be treated as a voluntary contribution to the organ donation contribu-
tion fund created in section 49-2447, Idaho Code, and not as a driver's li-
cense fee. Each voluntary contribution shall be deposited into the organ do-
nation contribution fund created in section 49-2447, Idaho Code.
(5) Every application shall state the applicant's true and full name,
date of birth, sex, declaration of Idaho residency, Idaho residence address
and mailing address if different, height, weight, hair color, eye color, and
social security number as verified by the social security administration.
If an applicant has submitted an application pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 58, title 19, Idaho Code, then the applicant may state, in his or
her application pursuant to this section, the applicant's alternative Idaho
mailing address in place of his or her Idaho residence address and mail-
ing address. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 49-303(13), Idaho
Code, an applicant for a nondomiciled class A, B or C driver's license or
nondomiciled commercial learner's permit having residency in a state that
is prohibited from issuing class A, B or C driver's licenses or commercial
learner's permits, as provided in 49 CFR 384, is excepted from providing
proof of Idaho residency and an Idaho mailing address.
(a) The requirement that an applicant provide a social security number
as verified by the social security administration shall apply only to
applicants who have been assigned a social security number.
(b) An applicant who has not been assigned a social security number
shall:
(i) Present written verification from the social security admin-
istration that the applicant has not been assigned a social secu-
rity number; and
(ii) Submit a birth certificate, passport or other documentary
evidence issued by an entity other than a state or the United
States; and
(iii) Submit such proof as the department may require that the ap-
plicant is lawfully present in the United States.
A driver's license, commercial learner's permit or any instruction
permit issued on and after January 1, 1993, shall not contain an appli-
cant's social security number. Applications on file shall be exempt
from disclosure except as provided in sections 49-202, 49-203, 49-203A
and 49-204, Idaho Code.


(c) Every application for a class A, B or C license shall state where the
applicant has been licensed for the preceding ten (10) years and under
which of the following driving categories the applicant will operate:
(i) Non-excepted interstate. The applicant operates or expects
to operate in interstate commerce and is required to provide a med-
ical examiner's certificate;
(ii) Excepted interstate. The applicant operates or expects to
operate in interstate commerce, but engages exclusively in trans-
portation or operations excepted by the federal motor carrier
safety administration from all or parts of the qualification re-
quirements of federal motor carrier safety regulation 49, part
391, and is therefore not required to provide a medical examiner's
certificate;
(iii) Non-excepted intrastate. The applicant operates only in
intrastate commerce and is subject to and meets all Idaho driver
qualification requirements and the applicable parts of federal
motor carrier safety regulation 49, part 391, and is required to
provide a medical examiner's certificate; or
(iv) Excepted intrastate. The applicant operates in intrastate
commerce, but engages exclusively in exempted transportation or
operations as listed in section 67-2901B(2), Idaho Code, and the
applicable parts of federal motor carrier safety regulation 49,
part 391, and is therefore not required to provide a medical exam-
iner's certificate.
All applications shall also state whether the applicant has previously
been licensed as a driver and, if so, when and by what state or country
and whether a driver's license or privileges have ever been suspended,
revoked, denied, disqualified, canceled or refused and, if so, the
date of and reason for the suspension, revocation, denial, disquali-
fication, cancellation or refusal and the applicant's oath that all
information is correct as signified by the applicant's signature.
(d) The applicant must submit proof of identity and citizenship sta-
tus acceptable to the examiner or the department and date of birth as
set forth in a certified copy of his birth certificate. When a certified
copy of his birth certificate or a delayed birth certificate is impossi-
ble to obtain from a vital statistics agency, another government-issued
document may be submitted that provides satisfactory evidence of a per-
son's full legal name and date of birth acceptable to the examiner or the
department.
(e) Every applicant for a class A, B or C driver's license or commer-
cial learner's permit shall provide proof of United States citizenship
or lawful permanent residency in the United States upon application for
issuance, transfer, upgrade or renewal, unless the applicant's driving
record already contains documentation confirming United States citi-
zenship or lawful permanent residency. Every applicant for a nondomi-
ciled class A, B or C driver's license or commercial learner's permit
domiciled in a foreign country must provide an unexpired employment au-
thorization document issued by the department of homeland security or
an unexpired foreign passport accompanied by an approved I-94 form doc-
umenting the applicant's most recent admittance into the United States.


(f) Individuals required to register in compliance with section 3 of
the federal military selective service act, 50 U.S.C. App. 451 et seq.,
as amended, shall be provided an opportunity to fulfill such registra-
tion requirements in conjunction with an application for a driver's li-
cense, commercial learner's permit or instruction permit. Any regis-
tration information so supplied shall be transmitted by the department
to the selective service system.
(6) Whenever an application is received from a person previously li-
censed in another jurisdiction, the department shall request a copy of the
driver's record from the other jurisdiction and shall contact the national
driver register. When received, the driver's record from the previous ju-
risdiction shall become a part of the driver's record in this state with the
same force and effect as though entered on the driver's record in this state
in the original instance.
(7) Whenever the department receives a request for a driver's record
from another licensing jurisdiction, the record shall be forwarded without
charge.
(8) The department shall contact and notify the commercial driver li-
cense information system of the proposed application for a class A, B or C
driver's license or commercial learner's permit to ensure identification of
the person and to obtain clearance to issue the license.
(9) The department shall request information from the drug and alco-
hol clearinghouse to determine whether an applicant for any class A, B, or C
driver's license or commercial learner's permit is eligible for the creden-
tial.
(10) A contractor administering a class A, B, or C skills test may col-
lect an additional fee for the use of the contractor's vehicle for the skills
test.
(11) The department may issue seasonal class B or C driver's licenses to
drivers who are employees of agri-chemical businesses, custom harvesters,
farm retail outlets and suppliers, and livestock feeders that:
(a) Will be valid only for driving commercial vehicles that normally
require class B or C commercial driver's licenses;
(b) Will be valid for seasonal periods that begin on the date of is-
suance and that are not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days in a
twelve (12) month period;
(c) May be obtained only twice in a driver's lifetime;
(d) Are valid only within a one-hundred-fifty (150) mile radius of the
place of business or farm being serviced; and
(e) Will be valid only in conjunction with valid Idaho class D driver's
licenses.
(12) The department may issue seasonal class B or C driver's licenses to
drivers who:
(a) Have not violated the single license provisions of applicable fed-
eral regulations;
(b) Have not had any license suspensions, revocations or cancella-
tions;
(c) Have not had any convictions in any vehicle for any offense listed
in section 49-335(1) or (2), Idaho Code, or any one (1) serious traffic
offense;


(d) Have at least one (1) year of driving experience with a class D or
equivalent license in any type of motor vehicle; and
(e) Are at least sixteen (16) years old.
SECTION 30. That Section 49-452, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-452. EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES FEE. (1) An emergency medical ser-
vices fee of one dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) shall be collected in
addition to each motor vehicle registration fee amount collected under the
provisions of this chapter, with the exception of those vehicles proportion-
ally registered under section 49-435, Idaho Code. Twenty-five cents (25¢)
of the fee shall be retained by the county of residence for use in funding lo-
cal emergency medical service costs. One dollar ($1.00) of the fee shall be
transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical ser-
vices fund established in section 56-1018 57-829, Idaho Code.
(2) For vehicles registered under the provisions of section 49-402B,
Idaho Code, the fee shall be two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50). Fifty cents
(50¢) of the fee shall be retained by the county of residence for use in fund-
ing local emergency medical services costs. Two dollars ($2.00) of the fee
shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency med-
ical services fund established in section 56-1018 57-829, Idaho Code.
SECTION 31. That Section 49-910A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-910A. COLOR OF LAMPS AND GLOBES LIMITED TO CERTAIN VEHICLE
CLASSES. For the purposes of this chapter lighting devices utilizing various
colors of lighted globes approved by the director of the Idaho state police
for use on vehicles shall be restricted to the following class of vehicles:
(1) Police vehicles. Only police vehicles shall display blue lights,
lenses or globes.
(2) Designated emergency vehicles. Fire fighting vehicles, vehicles
belonging to personnel of voluntary fire departments, vehicles belonging
to, or operated by EMS personnel certified or otherwise recognized by the EMS
bureau of the Idaho department of health and welfare Idaho military division
while in the performance of emergency medical services, ambulances, sher-
iff's search and rescue vehicles which are under the immediate supervision
of the county sheriff, and wreckers, as defined in section 49-124, Idaho
Code, which are engaged in motor vehicle recovery operations and are block-
ing part or all of one or more lanes of traffic, are designated emergency
vehicles. With the exception of school buses as provided in section 49-915,
Idaho Code, only fire fighting vehicles, vehicles belonging to personnel
of voluntary fire departments, vehicles belonging to, or operated by EMS
personnel certified or otherwise recognized by the EMS bureau of the Idaho
department of health and welfare Idaho military division while in the per-
formance of emergency medical services, ambulances, designated emergency
vehicles described herein, vehicles authorized by the Idaho transportation
board for use in the enforcement of vehicle laws specified in section 40-510,
Idaho Code, and other emergency vehicles designated by the director of the


Idaho state police may display red flashing lights or red lenses or globes
which are visible from the front of the vehicle.
(3) All vehicles. Any motor vehicle may have attached to it a flash-
ing amber light to warn motorists of a vehicular traffic hazard requiring
the exercise of unusual care in approaching, overtaking or passing the ve-
hicle displaying such lighting. The driver of an approaching vehicle shall
yield the right-of-way to any stationary vehicle displaying a flashing amber
light.
SECTION 32. That Section 56-1003, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-1003. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE DIRECTOR. The director shall have
the following powers and duties:
(1) All of the powers and duties of the department of public health, the
department of health, the board of health, and all nonenvironmental protec-
tion duties of the department of health and welfare are hereby vested to the
director of the department of health and welfare. However, oversight of the
department and rulemaking and hearing functions relating to public health
and licensure and certification standards shall be vested in the board of
health and welfare. Except when the authority is vested in the board of
health and welfare under law, the director shall have all such powers and
duties as may have been or could have been exercised by his predecessors in
law, including the authority to adopt, promulgate, and enforce rules, and
shall be the successor in law to all contractual obligations entered into by
predecessors in law. All rulemaking proceedings and hearings of the direc-
tor shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.
(2) The director shall, pursuant and subject to the provisions of Idaho
Code and this chapter, promulgate and recommend to the board rules to admin-
ister statutes related to health and licensure and certification require-
ments pertinent to health. Such rules may be of general application across
the state or may be limited in time, place, and circumstance as needed to ad-
dress problems.
(3) The director, under rules adopted by the board, shall have general
supervision of the health and welfare of the people of this state. The powers
and duties of the director shall include but are not limited to the follow-
ing:
(a) The education of the people of this state using guidelines and rec-
ommendations for issues of health, safety, mental health, and wellness;
(b) The issuance of licenses and permits as prescribed by law and by the
rules of the board;
(c) The supervision and administration of laboratories and the super-
vision and administration of standards of tests for environmental pol-
lution, chemical analyses and communicable diseases. The director may
require that laboratories operated by any city, county, institution,
person, firm or corporation for health or environmental purposes con-
form to standards set by the board of health and welfare and the board of
environmental quality in rule;
(d) The supervision and administration of a mental health program,
which shall include services for the evaluation, screening, custody and


treatment of the mentally ill and those persons suffering from a mental
defect or mental defects, and services for the prevention of suicide;
(e) The enforcement of minimum standards of health, safety, and sani-
tation for all public swimming pools within the state as established in
rule of the board;
(f) The supervision and administration of the various schools, hos-
pitals, and institutions that were the responsibility of the board of
health and welfare;
(g) The supervision and administration of services dealing with sub-
stance abuse, including but not limited to treatment and rehabilita-
tion;
(h) Communication and cooperation with other governmental depart-
ments, agencies and boards in order to effectively assist with the
planning for the control of or abatement of health problems. All of the
rules adopted by the board shall apply to state institutions;
(i) The supervision and administration of an emergency medical ser-
vices program, including but not limited to assisting other governmen-
tal agencies and local governmental units, in providing first aid emer-
gency medical services and for transportation of the sick and injured;
(j) (i) The supervision of administrative units whose responsibility
shall be to assist and encourage counties, cities, other governmental
units, and industries in the control of and/or abatement of health prob-
lems; and
(k) (j) The enforcement of all laws and rules relating to health.
(4) The director, when so designated by the governor, and any other time
subject to the standard appropriations and approval process of the legisla-
ture, shall have the power to apply for, receive on behalf of the state, and
utilize any federal aid, grants, gifts, or moneys made available through the
federal government.
(5) The director shall have the power to enter into and make contracts
and agreements with any public agencies or municipal corporations for the
use of facilities, land, and equipment when such use will have a beneficial,
recreational, or therapeutic effect or be in the best interest in carrying
out the duties imposed upon the department. The director shall also have the
power to enter into contracts for the expenditure of state matching funds for
local purposes. This subsection will constitute the authority for public
agencies or municipal corporations to enter into such contracts and expend
money for the purposes delineated in such contracts.
(6) The director is authorized to adopt an official seal to be used on
appropriate occasions, in connection with the functions of the department or
the board, and such seal shall be judicially noticed. Copies of any books,
records, papers and other documents in the department shall be admitted in
evidence equally with the originals thereof when authenticated under such
seal.
(7) The director, under rules adopted by the board of health and welfare
and approved by the legislature pursuant to section 67-5291, Idaho Code,
and section 29, article III of the constitution of the state of Idaho, shall
have the power to impose and enforce orders of isolation, quarantine, or
restricted access to protect the public from the spread of infectious or
communicable diseases or from contamination from chemical, nuclear, or bi-


ological agents, whether naturally occurring or propagated by criminal or
terrorist act.
(a) An order of isolation may be issued only for a person diagnosed with
an infectious or a communicable disease, presenting medically unknown
symptoms, or contaminated from a chemical, nuclear, or biological agent
and only while a person is infectious, displaying unknown symptoms, or
contaminated.
(b) An order of quarantine may be issued only for a person exposed to:
(i) An infectious or a communicable disease;
(ii) A person displaying medically unknown symptoms; or
(iii) Contamination from a chemical, nuclear, or biological
agent;
under circumstances likely to result in the spread of the disease, symp-
toms, or contaminant to the person who had such contact and only for a
reasonable period of time sufficient to determine whether the exposed
person will become sick.
(c) If the director has reasonable cause to believe a chemical, nu-
clear, or biological agent has been released in an identifiable place,
including a building or structure, the director may impose an order of
restricted access into or out of that place for the purpose of determin-
ing whether that place has been contaminated with a chemical, nuclear,
or biological agent that may create a substantial and immediate danger
to the public. An order of restricted access shall be effective only
until such time as the contamination has been remediated and the area
of restricted access has been determined to no longer pose an immediate
health risk.
(d) An order of isolation, quarantine, or restricted access issued pur-
suant to this section shall not be subject to the Idaho administrative
procedure act, chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, but shall be subject to
judicial review as a final agency order. However, this shall not pre-
vent the director from reconsidering, amending, or withdrawing the or-
der. Judicial review of orders of isolation, quarantine, or restricted
access shall be de novo. The court may affirm, reverse, or modify the
order and shall affirm the order if the director shows by clear and con-
vincing evidence that the order is reasonably necessary to protect the
public from a substantial and immediate danger of the spread of an in-
fectious or communicable disease or from contamination by a chemical,
nuclear, or biological agent. A hearing on a request for review pur-
suant to this paragraph shall be held as soon as practicable but no later
than three (3) business days after the request is made. Notice of the
request for review to the court must be provided to the director. The
court may order the person who is the subject of or affected by the or-
der of isolation, quarantine, or restricted access to appear remotely
via technology approved by the Idaho supreme court. Upon conclusion of
a hearing described in this subsection, the court conducting judicial
review shall issue an order:
(i) Affirming or modifying the order of isolation, quarantine, or
restricted access; or
(ii) Reversing the order and releasing an individual who is the
subject of or affected by such order.


(e) Any person who violates an order of isolation, quarantine, or re-
stricted access shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
(8) The director shall develop safeguards necessary to ensure the se-
curity of nonpublic personal information in the department's possession and
to prevent undue disclosure of such information. The director shall estab-
lish a process to authenticate requests made by a person, entity or jurisdic-
tion arising under the 2007 Hague convention on the international recovery
of child support and other forms of family maintenance. In the event the de-
partment becomes aware of any improper disclosure, the director shall take
all actions required under section 28-51-105, Idaho Code.
SECTION 33. That Section 63-3622O, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
63-3622O. EXEMPT PRIVATE AND PUBLIC ORGANIZATIONS. (1) There are ex-
empted from the taxes imposed by this chapter:
(a) Sales to or purchases by hospitals, health-related entities, edu-
cational institutions, forest protective associations and canal compa-
nies that are nonprofit organizations; and
(b) Donations to, sales to, and purchases by the Idaho Foodbank Ware-
house, Inc.; and
(c) Donations to, sales to, and purchases by food banks or soup kitchens
of food or other tangible personal property used by food banks or soup
kitchens in the growing, storage, preparation or service of food, but
not including motor vehicles or trailers; and
(d) Sales of clothes to, donations of clothes to, and purchases of
clothes by nonsale clothiers; and
(e) Sales to or purchases by centers for independent living; and
(f) Sales to or purchases by the state of Idaho and its agencies and its
political subdivisions; and
(g) Sales to or purchases by volunteer fire departments or licensed
emergency medical service agencies; and
(h) Sales to or purchases by a qualifying senior citizen center; and
(i) Sales to or purchases by the Blind Services Foundation, Inc.; and
(j) Donations to, sales to or purchases by the Advocates for Survivors
of Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault, Inc., a nonprofit corporation;
and
(k) Sales to or purchases by nonprofit organizations offering free den-
tal clinic services to children; and
(l) Admissions to and purchases by museums, as defined in subsection
(2) of this section.
(2) As used in this section, these words shall have the following mean-
ings:
(a) "Educational institution" shall mean nonprofit colleges, univer-
sities, public charter schools organized pursuant to chapter 52, title
33, Idaho Code, the Idaho digital learning academy established pursuant
to chapter 55, title 33, Idaho Code, and other primary and secondary
schools, the income of which is devoted solely to education and in which
systematic instruction in the usual branches of learning is given. This
definition does not include schools primarily teaching business, danc-
ing, dramatics, music, cosmetology, writing, gymnastics, exercise and


other special accomplishments nor parent-teacher associations, parent
groups, alumni or other auxiliary organizations with purposes related
to the educational function of an institution or collective group of in-
stitutions.
(b) "Hospital" shall include nonprofit institutions licensed by the
state for the care of ill persons. It shall not extend to nursing homes
or similar institutions.
(c) "Health-related entities" shall mean the Idaho Cystic Fibrosis
Foundation, Idaho Epilepsy League, Idaho Lung Association, March of
Dimes, American Cancer Society, Camp Rainbow Gold, Mental Health As-
sociation, The Arc, The Children's Home Society of Idaho, American
Heart Association, Idaho Ronald McDonald House, United Cerebral Palsy,
Arthritis Foundation, Muscular Dystrophy Foundation, National Mul-
tiple Sclerosis Society, Rocky Mountain Kidney Association, American
Diabetes Association, Easter Seals, Idaho Community Action Agencies,
Idaho Primary Care Association and community health centers that are
members of the Idaho Primary Care Association, the Idaho Association of
Free and Charitable Clinics and its member clinics, the Idaho Diabetes
Youth Programs, Special Olympics Idaho, the Idaho Women's and Chil-
dren's Alliance, and the Family Services Alliance of Southeast Idaho,
together with said entities' local or regional chapters or divisions.
(d) "Canal companies" shall include nonprofit corporations that are
incorporated solely for the purpose of operating and maintaining and
are engaged solely in operation and maintenance of dams, reservoirs,
canals, lateral and drainage ditches, pumps or pumping plants.
(e) "Forest protective associations" shall mean associations whose
purpose is the furnishing, operating and maintaining of a protective
system for the detection, prevention and suppression of forest or range
fires. Forest protective associations shall include only those associ-
ations with which the state of Idaho has contracted or become a member of
pursuant to chapter 1, title 38, Idaho Code.
(f) "Food banks or soup kitchens" shall mean any nonprofit corporation
or association, other than the Idaho Foodbank Warehouse, Inc., one of
whose regular activities is the furnishing or providing of food or food
products to others without charge.
(g) "Nonsale clothier" shall mean any nonprofit corporation or associ-
ation, one of whose primary purposes is the furnishing or providing of
clothes to others without charge.
(h) "Clothes" shall mean garments in general, designed or intended to
be worn by humans, and shall include footwear in addition to wearing ap-
parel.
(i) "Center for independent living" shall mean a private, nonprofit,
nonresidential organization in which at least fifty-one percent (51%)
of the principal governing board, management and staff are individuals
with disabilities and that:
(i) Is designed and operated within a local community by individ-
uals with disabilities;
(ii) Provides an array of independent living services and pro-
grams; and
(iii) Is cross-disability.


(j) "Political subdivision" means:
(i) A governmental organization that:
1. Embraces a certain territory,
2. Is organized for public advantage and not in the interest
of private individuals or classes,
3. Has been delegated functions of government, and
4. Has the statutory power to levy taxes; or
(ii) A public health district created by section 39-408, Idaho
Code; or
(iii) A soil conservation district as defined in section 22-2717,
Idaho Code; or
(iv) A drainage district created pursuant to chapter 29, title
42, Idaho Code; or
(v) An irrigation district created pursuant to title 43, Idaho
Code; or
(vi) A state grazing board created by section 57-1204, Idaho
Code; or
(vii) A water measurement district created pursuant to section
42-705 or 42-706, Idaho Code; or
(viii) A ground water management district created pursuant to
chapter 51, title 42, Idaho Code.
(k) "Agency of the state of Idaho" shall mean an office or organization
created by the constitution or statutes of this state and constituting a
component part of the executive, judicial or legislative branch of the
government of this state.
(l) "Volunteer fire department" means an entity exempt from federal
income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code and which primarily provides fire protection or fire prevention on
a not-for-profit basis to surrounding residents.
(m) "Licensed emergency medical service agency" means an emergency
medical service (EMS) licensed by the EMS bureau of the department of
health and welfare Idaho military division and which is exempt from
federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Inter-
nal Revenue Code and which provides emergency medical services on a
not-for-profit basis to surrounding residents.
(n) "Qualifying senior citizen center" means an entity exempt from in-
come tax pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and
which is a community facility for the organization and provision of a
broad spectrum of services, which shall include provision of health,
including mental health, social, nutritional, and educational services
and the provision of facilities for recreational activities for older
individuals.
(o) "Museum" means a public institution or an entity exempt from income
tax pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, which
stores, preserves and exhibits objects of art, history, science or
other objects of historical, educational or cultural value on a perma-
nent basis in a building, portion of a building or outdoor location and
which provides museum services to the public on a regular basis.
(3) The exemption granted by subsection (1)(f) of this section does not
include any association or other organization whose members are political


subdivisions or state agencies unless the organization is expressly created
under the joint powers provision of sections 67-2328 through 67-2333, Idaho
Code.
(4) The exemptions granted by subsection (1) of this section do not in-
clude the use of tangible personal property by a contractor used to improve
real property of an exempt entity when such use is within the definition pro-
vided by section 63-3615(b), Idaho Code, whether the use tax liability is in-
cluded in a contract total or stated separately in a contract.
(5) There is exempted from the taxes imposed in this chapter the renting
of a place to sleep to an individual by the Idaho Ronald McDonald House.
SECTION 34. That Section 67-8802, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-8802. IDAHO LAW ENFORCEMENT, FIREFIGHTING AND EMS MEDAL OF HONOR
COMMISSION CREATED -- MEMBERSHIP -- ESTABLISHMENT OF QUALIFICATIONS FOR
AWARD. (1) There is hereby created in the office of the governor the Idaho
law enforcement, firefighting and EMS medal of honor commission, hereafter
referred to as the commission, which shall nominate candidates for the award
of the Idaho medal of honor. The commission shall consist of one (1) repre-
sentative from each of the following: the office of the governor, the office
of the attorney general, the Idaho prosecuting attorneys association, the
Idaho chiefs of police association, the Idaho fire chiefs association, the
Idaho sheriffs' association, the Idaho peace officers association, the
Idaho department of health and welfare bureau of emergency medical services
military division, the peace officers standards and training council, and
the professional firefighters of Idaho. Members of the commission shall be
appointed by the governor and shall each serve for a term of four (4) years.
Members of the commission shall hold office until the latter of expiration
of the term to which the member was appointed or his successor has been duly
appointed and qualified.
(2) The attorney general or his designee shall serve as chair of the
commission and shall designate a secretary for the commission.
(3) The commission shall meet annually, or at the call of the chair, to
consider candidates for nomination. Commission meetings may be conducted
via teleconference.
(4) The commission may adopt such rules as it deems necessary to carry
out the purposes of this chapter.
SECTION 35. That Section 67-8806, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-8806. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "EMS" means emergency medical services.
(2) "Emergency medical services provider" or "EMS provider" means an
emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician, or
paramedic licensed by the department of health and welfare pursuant to sec-
tions 56-1011 through 56-1018B, Idaho military division pursuant to chapter
9, title 46, Idaho Code, and an ambulance-based clinician as defined in the
rules governing emergency medical services as adopted by the department of
health and welfare certified pursuant to chapter 9, title 46, Idaho Code.


(3) "Exceptional meritorious conduct" means an act of bravery and self-
sacrifice, at the risk of serious injury or loss of one's own life, which is
so conspicuous as to clearly distinguish the individual above his comrades.
(4) "Firefighter" means a volunteer member or paid employee whose pri-
mary duty is preventing, extinguishing, or investigating fires and who pre-
vents, extinguishes, or investigates fires as part of a fire district, fire
department, or agency that is a part of or administered by the state or any
political subdivision thereof.
(5) "Law enforcement officer" means a volunteer member or a paid em-
ployee of a police or law enforcement agency that is a part of or administered
by the state, a federally recognized Indian tribe, or any political subdi-
vision of the state whose primary duties are the prevention and detection of
crime and the enforcement of the laws of this state or any of its political
subdivisions.
(6) "Serious injury" means any injury that causes great bodily harm and
a probability of death, any injury that causes significant permanent disfig-
urement, or any injury that causes a significant permanent loss or impair-
ment of the function of any body part or organ.
SECTION 36. That Section 72-451, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-451. PSYCHOLOGICAL ACCIDENTS AND INJURIES. (1) Psychological in-
juries, disorders or conditions shall not be compensated under this title,
unless the following conditions are met:
(a) Such injuries of any kind or nature emanating from the workplace
shall be compensated only if caused by accident and physical injury
as defined in section 72-102(17)(a) through (17)(c), Idaho Code, or
only if accompanying an occupational disease with resultant physical
injury, except that a psychological mishap or event may constitute an
accident where:
(i) It results in resultant physical injury as long as the psycho-
logical mishap or event meets the other criteria of this section;
(ii) It is readily recognized and identifiable as having occurred
in the workplace; and
(iii) It must be the product of a sudden and extraordinary event;
(b) No compensation shall be paid for such injuries arising from con-
ditions generally inherent in every working situation or from a person-
nel-related action including, but not limited to, disciplinary action,
changes in duty, job evaluation or employment termination;
(c) Such accident and injury must be the predominant cause as compared
to all other causes combined of any consequence for which benefits are
claimed under this section;
(d) Where psychological causes or injuries are recognized by this sec-
tion, such causes or injuries must exist in a real and objective sense;
(e) Any permanent impairment or permanent disability for psychologi-
cal injury recognizable under the Idaho worker's compensation law must
be based on a condition sufficient to constitute a diagnosis using the
terminology and criteria of the American psychiatric association's di-
agnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders, third edition re-
vised, or any successor manual promulgated by the American psychiatric


association, and must be made by a psychologist or psychiatrist duly li-
censed to practice in the jurisdiction in which treatment is rendered;
and
(f) Clear and convincing evidence that the psychological injuries
arose out of and in the course of the employment from an accident or oc-
cupational disease as contemplated in this section is required.
(2) Nothing in subsection (1) of this section shall be construed as
allowing compensation for psychological injuries from psychological causes
without accompanying physical injury.
(3) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall apply to ac-
cidents and injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1994, and to causes of ac-
tion for benefits accruing on or after July 1, 1994, notwithstanding that
the original worker's compensation claim may have occurred prior to July 1,
1994.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, post-traumatic
stress injury suffered by a first responder is a compensable injury or occu-
pational disease when the following conditions are met:
(a) The first responder is examined and subsequently diagnosed with
post-traumatic stress injury by a psychologist, a psychiatrist duly li-
censed to practice in the jurisdiction where treatment is rendered, or a
counselor trained in post-traumatic stress injury; and
(b) Clear and convincing evidence indicates that the post-traumatic
stress injury was caused by an event or events arising out of and in the
course of the first responder's employment.
(5) No compensation shall be paid for such injuries described in sub-
section (2) of this section arising from a personnel-related action includ-
ing, but not limited to, disciplinary action, changes in duty, job evalua-
tion, or employment termination.
(6) As used in subsection (4) of this section:
(a) "Post-traumatic stress injury" means a disorder that meets the di-
agnostic criteria for post-traumatic stress disorder or post-traumatic
stress injury specified by the American psychiatric association's di-
agnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders, fifth edition re-
vised, or any successor manual promulgated by the American psychiatric
association.
(b) "First responder" means:
(i) A peace officer as defined in section 19-5101(d), Idaho Code,
when employed by a city, county, or the Idaho state police;
(ii) A firefighter as defined in section 59-1302(16), Idaho Code;
(iii) A volunteer emergency responder as defined in section
72-102(31), Idaho Code;
(iv) An emergency medical service services provider, or EMS
provider, certified by the department of health and welfare pur-
suant to sections 56-1011 through 56-1018B, Idaho Code, and an
ambulance-based clinician as defined in the rules governing emer-
gency medical services as adopted by the department of health and
welfare; and certified pursuant to chapter 9, title 46, Idaho
Code; and
(v) An emergency communications officer as defined in section
19-5101(f), Idaho Code.


(7) Subsections (4) through (6) of this section are effective for first
responders with dates of injury or manifestations of occupational disease on
or after July 1, 2019.
SECTION 37. That Section 74-106, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
74-106. RECORDS EXEMPT FROM DISCLOSURE -- PERSONNEL RECORDS, PER-
SONAL INFORMATION, HEALTH RECORDS, PROFESSIONAL DISCIPLINE. The following
records are exempt from disclosure:
(1) Except as provided in this subsection, all personnel records of
a current or former public official other than the public official's pub-
lic service or employment history, classification, pay grade and step,
longevity, gross salary and salary history, including bonuses, severance
packages, other compensation or vouchered and unvouchered expenses for
which reimbursement was paid, status, workplace and employing agency. All
other personnel information relating to a public employee or applicant,
including but not limited to information regarding sex, race, marital sta-
tus, birth date, home address and telephone number, social security number,
driver's license number, applications, testing and scoring materials,
grievances, correspondence and performance evaluations, shall not be dis-
closed to the public without the employee's or applicant's written consent.
Names of applicants to classified or merit system positions shall not be dis-
closed to the public without the applicant's written consent. Disclosure of
names as part of a background check is permitted. Names of the five (5) final
applicants to all other positions shall be available to the public. If such
group is less than five (5) finalists, then the entire list of applicants
shall be available to the public. A public official or authorized represen-
tative may inspect and copy his personnel records, except for material used
to screen and test for employment.
(2) Retired employees' and retired public officials' home addresses,
home telephone numbers and other financial and nonfinancial membership
records; and active and inactive member financial and membership records
and mortgage portfolio loan documents maintained by the public employee re-
tirement system. Financial statements prepared by retirement system staff,
funding agents and custodians concerning the investment of assets of the
public employee retirement system of Idaho are not considered confidential
under this chapter.
(3) Information and records submitted to the Idaho state lottery for
the performance of background investigations of employees, lottery retail-
ers and major procurement contractors; audit records of lottery retailers,
vendors and major procurement contractors submitted to or performed by the
Idaho state lottery; validation and security tests of the state lottery for
lottery games; and business records and information submitted pursuant to
sections 67-7412(8) and (9) and 67-7421(8) and (9), Idaho Code, and such
documents and information obtained and held for the purposes of lottery se-
curity and investigative action as determined by lottery rules, unless the
public interest in disclosure substantially outweighs the private need for
protection from public disclosure.
(4) Records of a personal nature as follows:
(a) Records of personal debt filed with a public agency pursuant to law;


(b) Personal bank records compiled by a public depositor for the pur-
pose of public funds transactions conducted pursuant to law;
(c) Records of ownership of financial obligations and instruments of a
public agency, such as bonds, compiled by the public agency pursuant to
law;
(d) Records with regard to the ownership of or security interests in
registered public obligations;
(e) Vital statistics records;
(f) Military records as described in and pursuant to section 65-301,
Idaho Code;
(g) Social security numbers; and
(h) The following personal data identifiers for an individual may be
disclosed only in the following redacted format:
(i) The initials of any minor children of the individual;
(ii) A date of birth in substantially the following format:
XX/XX/birth year;
(iii) The last four (4) digits of a financial account number in
substantially the following format: XXXXX1234;
(iv) The last four (4) digits of a driver's license number or
state-issued personal identification card number in substan-
tially the following format: XXXXX350F; and
(v) The last four (4) digits of an employer identification number
or business's taxpayer identification number.
(5) Information in an income or other tax return measured by items of
income or sales that is gathered by a public agency for the purpose of admin-
istering the tax, except such information to the extent disclosed in a writ-
ten decision of the tax commission pursuant to a taxpayer protest of a defi-
ciency determination by the tax commission, under the provisions of section
63-3045B, Idaho Code.
(6) Records of a personal nature related directly or indirectly to the
application for and provision of statutory services rendered to persons
applying for public care for people who are elderly, indigent or have mental
or physical disabilities or participation in an environmental or a public
health study, provided the provisions of this subsection making records
exempt from disclosure shall not apply to the extent that such records or
information contained in those records are necessary for a background check
on an individual that is required by federal law regulating the sale of
firearms, guns or ammunition.
(7) Employment security information, except that a person may agree,
through written, informed consent, to waive the exemption so that a third
party may obtain information pertaining to the person, unless access to the
information by the person is restricted by subsection (3)(a), (b) or (d)
of section 74-113, Idaho Code. Notwithstanding the provisions of section
74-113, Idaho Code, a person may not review identifying information con-
cerning an informant who reported to the department of labor a suspected
violation by the person of the employment security law, chapter 13, title 72,
Idaho Code, under an assurance of confidentiality. As used in this section
and in chapter 13, title 72, Idaho Code, "employment security information"
means any information descriptive of an identifiable person or persons that
is received by, recorded by, prepared by, furnished to or collected by the


department of labor or the industrial commission in the administration of
the employment security law.
(8) Any personal records, other than names, business addresses and
business phone numbers, such as parentage, race, religion, sex, height,
weight, tax identification and social security numbers, financial worth or
medical condition submitted to any public agency pursuant to a statutory
requirement for licensing, certification, permit or bonding.
(9) Unless otherwise provided by agency rule, information obtained as
part of an inquiry into a person's fitness to be granted or retain a license,
certificate, permit, privilege, commission or position and private associ-
ation peer review committee records authorized in title 54, Idaho Code. Any
agency that has records exempt from disclosure under the provisions of this
subsection shall annually make available a statistical summary of the number
and types of matters considered and their disposition.
(10) The records, findings, determinations and decisions of any prelit-
igation screening panel formed under chapters 10 and 23, title 6, Idaho Code.
(11) Complaints received by the board of medicine and investigations
and informal proceedings, including informal proceedings of any committee
of the board of medicine, pursuant to chapter 18, title 54, Idaho Code, and
rules adopted thereunder.
(12) Records of the department of health and welfare or a public health
district that identify a person infected with a reportable disease.
(13) Records of hospital care, medical records, including prescrip-
tions, drug orders, records or any other prescription information that
specifically identifies an individual patient, prescription records main-
tained by the board of pharmacy under sections 37-2726 and 37-2730A, Idaho
Code, records of psychiatric care or treatment and professional counseling
records relating to an individual's condition, diagnosis, care or treat-
ment, provided the provisions of this subsection making records exempt from
disclosure shall not apply to the extent that such records or information
contained in those records are necessary for a background check on an indi-
vidual that is required by federal law regulating the sale of firearms, guns
or ammunition.
(14) Information collected pursuant to the directory of new hires act,
chapter 16, title 72, Idaho Code.
(15) Personal information contained in motor vehicle and driver records
that is exempt from disclosure under the provisions of chapter 2, title 49,
Idaho Code.
(16) Records of the financial status of prisoners pursuant to subsec-
tion (2) of section 20-607, Idaho Code.
(17) Records of the Idaho state police or department of correction re-
ceived or maintained pursuant to section 19-5514, Idaho Code, relating to
DNA databases and databanks.
(18) Records of the department of health and welfare relating to a sur-
vey, resurvey or complaint investigation of a licensed nursing facility.
Such records shall, however, be subject to disclosure as public records as
soon as the facility in question has received the report and no later than the
fourteenth day following the date that department of health and welfare rep-
resentatives officially exit the facility pursuant to federal regulations.
Provided however, that for purposes of confidentiality, no record shall be


released under this section that specifically identifies any nursing facil-
ity resident.
(19) Records and information contained in the registry of immunizations
against childhood diseases maintained in the department of health and wel-
fare, including information disseminated to others from the registry by the
department of health and welfare.
(20) Records of the Idaho housing and finance association (IHFA) relat-
ing to the following:
(a) Records containing personal financial, family, health or similar
personal information submitted to or otherwise obtained by the IHFA;
(b) Records submitted to or otherwise obtained by the IHFA with regard
to obtaining and servicing mortgage loans and all records relating to
the review, approval or rejection by the IHFA of said loans;
(c) Mortgage portfolio loan documents;
(d) Records of a current or former employee other than the employee's
duration of employment with the association, position held and loca-
tion of employment. This exemption from disclosure does not include the
contracts of employment or any remuneration, including reimbursement
of expenses, of the executive director, executive officers or commis-
sioners of the association. All other personnel information relating
to an association employee or applicant, including but not limited to
information regarding sex, race, marital status, birth date, home ad-
dress and telephone number, applications, testing and scoring materi-
als, grievances, correspondence, retirement plan information and per-
formance evaluations, shall not be disclosed to the public without the
employee's or applicant's written consent. An employee or authorized
representative may inspect and copy that employee's personnel records,
except for material used to screen and test for employment or material
not subject to disclosure elsewhere in the Idaho public records act.
(21) Records of the department of health and welfare related to child
support services in cases in which there is reasonable evidence of domestic
violence, as defined in chapter 63, title 39, Idaho Code, that can be used
to locate any individuals in the child support case except in response to a
court order.
(22) Records of the Idaho state bar lawyer assistance program pursuant
to chapter 49, title 54, Idaho Code, unless a participant in the program au-
thorizes the release pursuant to subsection (4) of section 54-4901, Idaho
Code.
(23) Records and information contained in the time-sensitive emergency
registry created by chapter 20, title 57 time sensitive emergency registry
created by chapter 9, title 46, Idaho Code, together with any reports, analy-
ses and compilations created from such information and records.
(24) Records contained in the court files or other records prepared as
part of proceedings for judicial authorization of sterilization procedures
pursuant to chapter 39, title 39, Idaho Code.
(25) The physical voter registration application on file in the county
clerk's office; however, a redacted copy of said application shall be made
available consistent with the requirements of this section. Information
from the voter registration application maintained in the statewide voter
registration database, including age, will be made available except for


the voter's driver's license number, date of birth and, upon a showing that
the voter comes within the provisions of subsection (30) of this section or
upon showing of good cause by the voter to the county clerk in consultation
with the county prosecuting attorney, the physical residence address of the
voter. For the purposes of this subsection, good cause shall include the
protection of life and property and protection of victims of domestic vio-
lence and similar crimes.
(26) Information in the files of the health care directive registry
maintained by the department of health and welfare under section 39-4515,
Idaho Code, is confidential and shall not be disclosed to any person other
than to the person who executed an advance care planning document or the re-
vocation thereof and that person's surrogate decision-maker, to the person
who registered an advance care planning document or revocation thereof, and
to physicians, hospitals, medical personnel, nursing homes, and other per-
sons who have been granted access to the documents in the registry.
(27) Records in an address confidentiality program participant's file
as provided for in chapter 57, title 19, Idaho Code, other than the address
designated by the secretary of state, except under the following circum-
stances:
(a) If requested by a law enforcement agency, to the law enforcement
agency; or
(b) If directed by a court order, to a person identified in the order.
(28) Except as otherwise provided by law relating to the release of in-
formation to a governmental entity or law enforcement agency, any personal
information, including but not limited to names, personal and business ad-
dresses and phone numbers, sex, height, weight, date of birth, social secu-
rity and driver's license numbers, or any other identifying numbers or in-
formation related to any Idaho fish and game licenses, permits and tags un-
less written consent is obtained from the affected person.
(29) Documents and records related to alternatives to discipline that
are maintained by the Idaho board of veterinary medicine under the provi-
sions of section 54-2118(1)(b), Idaho Code, provided the requirements set
forth therein are met.
(30) The Idaho residential street address and telephone number of an
eligible law enforcement or judicial officer and such officer's residing
household members as provided for in chapters 58 and 62, title 19, Idaho
Code, except under the following circumstances:
(a) If directed by a court order, to a person identified in the court
order;
(b) If requested by a law enforcement agency, to the law enforcement
agency;
(c) If requested by a financial institution or title company for busi-
ness purposes, to the requesting financial institution or title com-
pany; or
(d) If the law enforcement or judicial officer provides written permis-
sion for disclosure of such information.
(31) All information exchanged between the Idaho transportation de-
partment and insurance companies, any database created, all information
contained in the verification system and all reports, responses or other


information generated for the purposes of the verification system, pursuant
to section 49-1234, Idaho Code.
(32) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the release of information
to the state controller as the state social security administrator as pro-
vided in section 59-1101A, Idaho Code.
(33) Personal information, including but not limited to property val-
ues, personal and business addresses, phone numbers, dates of birth, social
security and driver's license numbers or any other identifying numbers or
information maintained by the administrator of the unclaimed property law
set forth in chapter 5, title 14, Idaho Code. Nothing in this subsection
shall prohibit the release of names, last known city of residence, property
value ranges and general property information by the administrator for the
purpose of reuniting unclaimed property with its owner.
(34) Any personal information collected by the secretary of state,
pursuant to section 67-906(1)(b), Idaho Code, for the purpose of allowing
individuals to access the statewide electronic filing system authorized in
section 67-906, Idaho Code, except campaign contact phone numbers for candi-
dates or committees, which shall be publicly available upon request; and any
notification email addresses submitted as part of a lobbyist's registration
under section 67-6617, Idaho Code, of an employer, client, or designated
contact for the purpose of electronic notification of that employer, client,
or designated contact of a report filed under section 67-6619, Idaho Code.
SECTION 38. That Section 56-1013A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 39. That Section 56-1020, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 40. That Section 56-1021, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 41. That Section 56-1022, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 42. That Section 56-1025, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 43. That Section 56-1027, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 44. That Section 56-1028, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 45. That Section 56-1029, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 46. That Section 57-2001, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 47. That Section 57-2002, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.


SECTION 48. That Section 57-2003, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 49. That Section 57-2006, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 50. That Section 56-1018, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 51. That Section 56-1018A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 52. That Section 56-1018B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 53. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 1 through 49 of this act shall be in full force
and effect on and after July 1, 2025, and Sections 50 through 52 of this act
shall be in full force and effect on and after August 1, 2025.